All those little things that retail employees do? They’re open to algorithmic and video inspection. It’s a bad time to be an immature teenager working at Dunkin Donuts.
I’m kind of flabergasted that I’ve been nominated for an award! I have no idea what it is or why I have it but it’s an AWARD so of course I will gracefully accept it. I like awards a lot. Thank you SOOOOO much Diane for adding me to your list of nominees. Please visit Diane’s blog Pleasant Valley Sunday for some excellent writing and musings on life. And subscribe to it! I did. And good things happened.
I took this picture on Friday June 25th -the night of the full moon- from the Cape d'Or Lighthouse.
the owner is keeping his books behind the public glass.
I was nearing this point myself last Thursday, when I slapped on some makeup and presented an award at Chris Apollo Lynn's fantastic Roaries. I had just come from aerial dance and probably smelled bad. But the whole experience of going out, in a dress, watching a show and seeing a million people was pretty darn thrilling, maybe even more so than it would have been a year ago.
This made me wonder what they put in commercially sold soaps that makes it thicken with just water and a bit of glycerine? I guess it may be the same basic process as making the liquid laundry soap...if anyone knows, let me know what the "thickening " ingredient is :)
My home, with you
The three of them still searched around looking for any other possible evidence, even though it seemed that they had gotten rid of it all, and that their group was still safe; but I woke up.
Pineda-Moreno offers no such evidence. To the contrary, the driveway had no gate, no “No Trespassing” signs, and no features to prevent someone standing in the street from seeing the entire driveway. Additionally, one of the investigating agents testified that “an individual going up to the house to deliver the newspaper or to visit someone would have to go through the driveway to get to the house.” If a neighborhood child had walked up Pineda-Moreno’s driveway and crawled under his Jeep to retrieve a lost ball or runaway cat, Pineda-Moreno would have no grounds to complain. Thus, because Pineda-Moreno did not take steps to exclude passersby from his driveway, he cannot claim a reasonable expectation of privacy in it, regardless of whether a portion of it was located within the curtilage of his home.
As their spirits seek to merge
We bereft are all struggling to find a way to live with the hole in our lives, with the ongoing sadness, with the reality that grief is an unending (though perhaps diminishing) journey. No griever I have met has said, “Wait! I can’t be happy. I owe too much to his memory.” Grieving is a process, something we do, something that happens to us, but it is seldom the choice that is hinted at in the above example. Quite frankly, we are all sick of grieving, of being sad, but the only way not to be sad is to have our loved ones back with us, and since that is impossible in this world, we continue on as best as we can with our shattered lives. But we owe that to ourselves, not to his memory.
Throughout the Patrick Troughton era, there are hints of what we would get in Season 7 under John Pertwee. Under Troughton, we see more monsters, more scientists, more alien invasions and more near future and contemporary settings. However, more than any of the other Troughton stories, The Invasion stands out as a prototype for the earthbound Pertwee stories. We have the near future setting, the return of Lethbridge-Stewart, the first appearance of UNIT, Benton, an alien menace, scientists, gadgetry, a dastardly tycoon and military leaders turning out to be helping the bad guys. All the vital ingredients of the earthbound Pertwee stories are present. The temptation is to evaluate it purely in terms of what the show would become rather than as a story in itself.
Here we are doing a little ditty called "Jingle Jingle Jingle" It is about losing your car keys!! It is seriously a favorite of this group. As soon as I pass out the jingles they all start looking for someplace to "hide" their jingle bells!
We are publishing this article and recommend every Muslim not only to read it himself but to offer every other Muslim brother within his read.
To better assist you on this journey in the New Year, I reached out to some of the entrepreneurs and social media mavens I look up to and trust. Here are their top social-media trends for 2012:
My other grandmother, Gertrude, was also a good country cook, but she never served such a lavish table. Gertrude was much, much poorer in her young mother days than Lyda was, and Gertrude’s meals were plentiful in quantity but not so lavish in array was were Lyda’s.
This one boy came close to me and immediately struck conversation, in that simple way that kids do. He also began to whistle and I naturally assumed that he was trying to help me out. “So what’s her name?” Remember when I pointed out earlier that I wasn’t calling her by name? Well, clearly this is not a question I expected and needless to say I was ill prepared for it. “Ummmm, ehhh, Cess” I blurted. “What?”, he asked. Did this boy have a hearing problem. I thought I was audible enough. “Her name is Cess” I retorted. Cess? Why the hell did I choose the name Cess? I remember trying to find her a name that I didn’t sound silly saying and up until this point, I had failed. So she had remained nameless for over a year now. “What a cool name! Here Cess, here Cess”, the kid began calling as we chased the dog around. And Cess it would be from there on. I chuckled to myself.
Today was one of those days where everything seemed to piss me off.
They didn’t care and I couldn’t get away from them. Bob made fists and started punching. I didn’t punch back. I didn’t know how to fight and didn’t want to make the situation worse. The part that sticks with me, though is how quiet it was. The kids weren’t yelling or making loud noises and I was just getting punched.
Iván Meade – Knowing that you favour all Scottish things – I have a personal question to ask. Do you like haggis?
Hailing from St. Joseph, Missouri, Chase's Cherry Mash hit America's candy scene in 1918. Unassuming milk chocolate mixed liberally with Maraschino cherries. The initial whiff of cocoa is immediately overwhelmed by the powerful cherry scent. The peanuts provide a coarse texture, something for the crumbly chocolate to cling to, giving this strong fruity sweet a surprisingly gentle cocoa finish. According to their website, Cherry Mash is the third oldest candy bar in the U.S. and even has its own song. The 135 year old Chase Candy Company continues to operate as an independent business supplying treats that - while only regionally famous - are now available world wide. Definitely worth a taste if you haven't heard of them before (not being from the central midwest, I had not).
The car had slid off the road and rolled upside-down into a ditch. Still trapped in her seat, young Katie sat terrified and screaming, while her unconscious father slowly bled to death before her eyes. We don't know exactly how long it was before another motorist drove by and saw the car in the ditch, but police estimate that it was at least 45 minutes. Maybe if someone had come by sooner, things might have ended differently. I can't begin to imagine the horror Katie went through for those 45 minutes. She still wakes up screaming sometimes at night when she relives it in her dreams. As she grows older, the memories have become less vivid and more abstract, but she remembers. You don't ever forget something like that.
Hope your week is going well. I wanted to post this Halloween card I made, I'm entering into My Creative Time challenge. The challenge was for a CRICUTLESS card. I don't guess I knew there was such a thing!!! LOL Anyway, it forced me to dig out my Sizzix and a new die I just got from Emma at My Creative Time. I love it, it's the little plate the "Boo" is stamped on and it is just perfect for cards. We also had to use the colors black, purple, green and orange. I barely got my purple in there, but I did it.
It appears that both of these pieces presented us with many hurdles and proved to be quite a challenge for most of us.
At least her crazy hair is being reined in by some pony tail holders... with Mr. Jenkins, I am just at a total loss!
Depending on where you’re sitting, you’ll be able to point out: the crucifix, the tabernacle, statues of Our Lady, St. Michael, St. Clement and St. Joseph (if you’re hanging out in the foyer with a wiggly kid like we are), a station of the cross that’s near you (if you’re sitting near the sides), the stained-glass windows, the flowers, the candles, the organ, the piano…
Additionally, there are ethical concerns about using cells derived from a human embryo, he said.
The Wicomico County School Bus Contractors Association (WCSBCA) is against the idea and has been since it was introduced two years ago, when Supervisor of Transportation for the district Dave Reeve said a committee “decided they would be a worthy investment to help with safety and efficiency. But in summer of 2010 there were some issues with contractors. So we decided not to mandate it, but have a pilot year to get GPS systems on some buses.” The first buses to have the tracking devices installed were those operated by Handy’s Bus Service and Holloway Transit, who also happen to be two of the largest contractors the district deals with.
Jacques Pauw, Media24 Investigations
* 3 toillet and baths
Simon
Downed Economy - Emil & Friends
The “Bloody Foreigners” series will be nothing more than another dose of multicultural propaganda fermented by the bigoted contempt and hatred which our media and our political elite feel for us. However, they are the ones deserving of contempt for they are the liars and this is just another lie.
I'm heading home for the day
One of my biggest supporters and half of one of my favorite couples of all time...Jeff is the husband of one of my eBay hens, Kelly. He is hands down one of the kindest, funniest and most uplifting people I have ever had the pleasure of knowing. One of these days I'm going to roadtrip to Nebraska and hang out with Jeff and Kelly. Whether they like it or not.
Here’s one who doesn’t, though: James Shapiro. Dr. Shapiro is a microbiologist and a professor in the Department of Biochemistry and Molecular Biology at the University of Chicago. His undergraduate is from Harvard University.
But at the other end there's silence. Nothing. And then she laughs.
The proposed agreement was reached in consultation with Upper Chattahoochee Riverkeeper Inc., the environmental organization that brought the lawsuit against the city that led to the consent decree.
Dodger: "We'll leave as soon as we get our cat."
2. Put pieces in the pan of desired shape/size (I used a silicone pan)*
-Non-addictive as a nasal inhalant
This graceful little shrine is the Shrine of the Divine Inner Child! Your True Self beyond all masks and personas. That part of yourself that is true to his/her feelings, express joy and sadness alike, without feeling shame, creative, spontaneous and free from the critical self!
* 1 small onion (finely chopped)
this rainy day
I thought I was crazy when I only had two places of residence. Adding a third house to the mix of my already spread-thin life has only intensified the sense of never being where I should be for maximized productivity and efficiency. Let me explain.
I like the separation from real life!
27. Multilingualism
My soul grieved over their spiteful undermining and needful attempt to prove the validity of their lost case.
“Please,” I whisper. “For me?” Grumbling something about women, he snatches the nut from my outstretched arm, cracks it and scoops out the insides. I try to hide my grin unsuccessfully.
So afterward I dropped her off at Mile's office and while she worked for him, me, Willa, and a couple of Dylan's friends got to work at home setting a surprise party. For a couple weeks prior, Dylan had been trying to put together some sort of birthday dinner with her friends, but knowing we were planing to surprise her, they all , except for one, "declined"-had to work, were going to be out of town, etc. Dylan was pretty bummed, but resigned herself to hanging out with her one friend. She was totally surprised when we all jumped out of hiding spots and yelled when she walked through the door! It was a great party-great kids-laughing and tomfoolery. We set up the fire pit outside and had a great game of Jack's ALIVE-that will be another post, though. BEST campfire game!
"Advertisements which suggested gay people could be cured have been banned from London buses, UK transport chiefs say.
It seems that the Cabinet and Ministers Chris Grayling and Ian Duncan Smith have done everything they can to avoid reality.
If you have lots of dies, you could keep going all year! I suppose you could use almost anything to ink around really. Well, within reason!?
The words that best describe me: Lisa Gherardini, Mona Lisa, La Gioconda
Over there in the increasingly democracy-free eurozone, power is zooming with great centrifugal force towards a smaller and smaller Privy Council. In the Beginning there were 17 europeddlers, but Merkozy looked down and saw that this was bad. And so emerged the Groupe de Francfort – or GdF – consisting of 1 German, 1 French person, 1 Central Banker, 1 IMF plonker, and 1 Olli Rehn – the point of whom remains not entirely to the point. The group is named in memory of Sarko’s dash to the Trichet Memorial Dinner in Frankfurt in order to peel She Who Must be Obeyed off the ceiling. Other invitees are rare, but this newest Politburo made an exception for the President of the United States at the latest G20 meeting…..which once again, for those who need to catch up, achieved diddly-squat.
Finn is still gone. My neighbor tonight said that he saw a coyote in his yard early one morning recently. Things are not looking good for the little man. Laura is making "lost cat" flyers to put in our neighbors' mailboxes. But it's been a week now, and I'm starting to think that the little dude is really gone.
Since I've been working on the coats of poly (poly coat, sand, poly coat, sand etc... until it seems right), I don't have any good finished pics of the desktop so you'll have to wait to see those!
Many blessings to you!
Yes, it would be correct to conclude that the food alone makes this a favorite time of year in our family! However, it’s not the best time of year for our teeth and, in a home where morning and night teeth brushing are already occasions for pleading and fussing, the holiday season presents quite a challenge on this front.
North, all looked fine. West, the doors on the old shed my landlord used for storage were off their hinges, all 4 of them. Strange. Then I turned south. Nothing was moving. Not a blade of grass. Not a wisp of smoke but the whole area right up to, over and around the house was covered in debris. Insulation, small broken up sheets of plywood, 2 x 4’s had impaled the ground and were sticking straight up, others were lying flat, giant fans were lying tilted, their blades not moving. Everything was deadly quiet.
UCLA killed USC’s BCS title hopes. I’m not sure how the comparison is going to develop from here, except to say that if anyone gets to kill UCLA, it’s USC.
The facts above show India is much earlier in promoting the “Look East Policy” than the eastward transfer of American strategic focus. In order to realize the strategy of eastward transfer, the United States positively encouraged India to participate in the East Asian affairs.
When you first start out with Pay Per Click you should start with the Google Adwords network. Do not use any other content or partner networks, only Google. Track your conversions and click through rates on Google and when you get a campaign that is converting well then expand to the partner network.
We much continue to be enraged by crimes against humanity, and together we should try to work together for peace.
You saw me before I was born.
Then to the suede/leather I apply a product called "Sno-Seal." It is a beeswax based water proofing ointment-like substance that comes in a jar. It works best if the boots are warm because it helps melt the product deep into the leather/suede.
forget to feel-
I have friends who have had spouses and children die and I have had the question presented to me, “Why did God let this happen”? There are not many questions in life harder to address than discussing the loss of a loved one, and enduring the heartache that ensues. I have friends who have had loses in their lives, and I could see and feel the pain they were going through. They were hurt, despondent and looking for answers. When the question “Why did God let this happen” is asked of me sometimes it is very hard to give an answer that will comfort their wounded hearts.
and your faithful care,
The plan is to construct the new library in the immediate vicinity of several upper-division schools, including the CSI Burley campus. The students from the adjacent Cassia H.S. are excited to think that they will have a real library to access. They put a high value on such a privilege.
Incidentally, the most common chemicals found in primer residue are “lead styphnate”, “antimony sulphide”, and “barium nitrate”. Primer residue will be dealt with in some more detail later in this same posting.
This is not about the bands that are actually out on the road, on a real tour and playing at least 10 dates with out going home or for that matter a series of dates that take you out of your zip code with at least a good hundred plus miles between dates.
Krsna-core band
Donald and Ernest were black, while Sandy was Jewish.
Your wife and children want for nothing – except the puppy that took precedence over the economy and took the place of your admission that you knew about the bonuses.
Unibroue Trois Pistoles; Canada, Belgian Strong Ale, 9% abv
Daryl crushes on Tsugumi. Or Ayase. I have no idea which, probably both. But then because he’s so ~dark~ and ~edgy~ he wants to kill them so he’ll be himself (hahahah, like anything’s meant to make sense anymore) and can then be called ‘Daryl the Butcher’. So dark, so edgy.
Text the Romance Back with Michael Fiore
Subs: YAY.
I bought this mainly for the swing-top bottle for homebrewing. I figured instead of paying $3 for an empty bottle I'd put down a dollar more and get a brew out of the deal. It wasn't worth much more than that empty sterilized sparkling green bottle I would have gotten plus I'd still have my hard-won buck-a-bill. I remember my brother collected beer cans when I was a wee little animal and many of the names of the empty cans come flying through my head at odd moments for no particular reason. Schmidts. Rolling Rock. Red, White & Blue. Old Frothingslosh! But the one that came to mind when I tasted this one and still does is Champale! I think there was a standard version and a pink concoction. I never tasted them but this is what I would imagine that it tasted like: a beer and a cheap champagne spilled into the same bucket and consumed by the deprived and the profane. A limp-wristed little back biter that gives you the throw-up face with a little lemon squeezed into the bile. 1.5 saggy boobs to the left of no thank you.
(No, that’s not what I call my penis. His name is secret. Don’t ask cuz I won’t tell.)
2 cups sliced carrots
In some instances each of these solutions can work. However, they are by no means as universal fixes, as some in the development community often assumed. Not only does this narrative take away the agency of women, it also neglects the other side of the equation – the nature of care provided. It ignores what should be a fundamental question: why don’t we ensure that maternal health services are actually appealing to pregnant women?
But this argument has often fallen on deaf ears.
“Hell. The medallion is cursed that’s why it must be destroyed.”
The tasks I found to be pretty straightforward– I chose to make my new blog on WordPress rather than Blogger because I hadn’t created a new one on this platform before. As indicated on the posts, WordPress does a fairly good job of walking new users through the process of putting a blog together on their platform, so the instructions here don’t need to be too detailed. I mucked around a bit with templates (I chose this one because it had books on it, so I thought that was appropriate) but per the suggestion of the page I didn’t really touch Widgets yet, since we’ll get to them later. I did cheat a little bit here– I used WordPress’ native avatar system to put my visual stamp on the blog instead of the Yahoo one– but I generally don’t really care for Yahoo’s product, and anyway I already had this image on my hard drive, ready to be uploaded. (Yes, that IS a Magic: the Gathering card called Archivist. When nerd-doms collide…)
Overnight the Asian markets were mostly lower -0.6%. European markets opened lower but ended +0.1%. US index futures were lower overnight, then turned higher after some economic reports. At 8:30 Retail sales were reported lower: +0.8% vs +1.1%, and the NY FED was reported lower: 6.6 vs 20.2. The market gapped up at the open to SPX 1377 and hit 1380 in the opening minutes. The SPX had closed at 1370 on friday. After the opening spurt the market started to pullback. At 10:00 Business inventories were reported lower: +0.6% vs +0.7%, and the NAHB was reported lower as well: 25 vs 28. Also the FED issued the following: http://www.federalreserve.gov/newsevents/press/other/20120416a.htm. The pullback continued until around 10:30 when the SPX closed the opening gap and hit 1365. A rally to SPX 1371 followed by 11:00, then a pullback to 1366 by 12:30. After that a more substantial rally got underway. Around 2:00 the SPX hit 1376, then pulled back to close where it had ended on friday 1370.
Click HERE to join the My Craft Spot blog hop. You have the rest of the day to enter. Winners will be announced tomorrow.
This is a longer than average picture book. The concept of spying on and writing about one's neighbors is a theme in many other children's books so the specificity of Janie's Brooklyn neighborhood should not be a barrier to one's enjoyment of the book.
Genesis 1:26 states, “And God said, Let US make man in OUR image, according to OUR likeness.” Clearly, this entity is talking to others who are just like it and must include both male and female genders. If this was truly the One Creator, how is it possible that It didn’t know about the activities of these Watchers and take steps to stop them? If more proof of this is needed, consider the solution this loving “God” comes up with – send a flood to kill every living thing except a select group of humans and animals. Their crime was to allow themselves to receive knowledge of the secrets, especially of warfare, from the “angels”. Enoch regards these Watchers, led by Azazel’s efforts to enlighten humanity, in a negative light, obviously out of deferment to this “God” character, which is even more complex. According to his text, what we call “God” was the creator of physical humans through genetic manipulation. In order to them give them true life, another entity entirely was needed whom he called “Lord of the Spirits”. Add to this confusion, he also references “Ancient of Days” as God, as well as a being known as “Son of Man”. This being(s) who was so infuriated with the actions of these Watchers knew full well that the offspring known as the Nephilim, were immortal and that a decree had been made to essentially chain their spirits to the earth realm until a future day of judgment. They knew that, while the physical bodies of these Nephilim could be killed, their spirit would be trapped but able to interfere directly in the affairs of mankind. In the least, if the Biblical flood account has merit, this displays a measure of what can only be called incompetence on the part of so-called Gods. Long after the Flood is alleged to have taken place, there were many sources that corroborate that the Nephilim bloodlines continued. At the other end of the spectrum, it shows a blatant disregard for humanity and a very dark, unevolved side to this so-called “God”. The point is simply that a credible source has detailed some of the disembodied spirits that are available to a magician for contact.
i don't even know how i ended up in the greenhouse, but i fell prey to some savvy advertising while there.
We wanted to do something special for all our special blogger furiends out there. After all, we wouldn't be here if it wasn't for you guys and gals. So it's pretty simple. No essay writing. No application qualification. No contest. It's easy, just leave a comment. You have until next Saturday midnight our time (we live in CA), and we'll randomly pick a winner (we'll contact you later for your physical address), and that winner will get a special package in the mail. Isn't that pawesome!
Which is good.
One idea that has been floated in industry circles to accelerate solar’s emergence is an industry-wide promotional campaign, similar to the very successful “Got Milk?” campaign. Also known as a “check off” program, it is being considered by the Solar Energy Industries Association, according to SEIA President Rhone Resch.
Lots of house cleaning (yes, I think that's great...kill me now).
I hope that is not going to be voted by the Greeks , the far-right (Neonazi) party.
In fact, when the apostle Paul wrote this verse on contentment, he himself was on An UNSELFISH, LIFE GIVING mission to start churches in as many cities as possible….
5. I don't have a 'real job' outside of teaching classes, and Digi's With Attitude!
There are many ways of becoming successful. But is there a formula, and ‘exercise’ that we can do that will help us become more successful? The answer quite simply is YES, and in this week’s Mojo, Tom Tognoli shares that concept with us in a way that is easy and simple. So get ready learn how to build your ‘success muscle’
But looking at this shirt, I understood why MH is such a hit in Japan - it has the kind of simplicity that has been refined and refined without losing that sense of "rawness" and that's very much in tune with a certain Japanese aesthetic. The silk cotton has raw, rough/smooth quality that feels very no-nonsense; the seams, collar and cuffs are neat and precise but they are not meant to look razor sharp and slick.It's very unassuming, elegant, and it's very confident in its simplicity. I like that. It feels luxurious to me in a way that's different from say, a Birkin bag.
I have returned.
I’m afraid of allowing myself to get excited for these changes — what if my expectations are raised and they never happen after all? I’ve been so focused on NOT dreaming about these things for so long, I’m afraid to let my mind finally “go there” for fear that they will never happen after all.
Our goal is $5,000 and if 333 friends gave $15 each we would meet that goal. How easy is that!! Also, if you donate $25 or more you will receive one of our adoption t-shirts!!
These experiences and strategies mark the presence of absence. Since I contracted Polio at age 7, I have faced constant reminders of that which is no longer. I imagine I was drawn to the French psychoanalyst and philosopher, Jaques Lacan, largely due to his concern with the lingering presence of that which is gone.
I made the simple and quick 4 1/4" x 5 1/2" (standard) card you see at the top of the post with the CTMH March Stamp of the Month
Rob tells me that the city of Barcelona was completely packed on Monday. All the main streets were lined with book stalls and there were ‘rose salesmen’ everywhere. There were line-ups to see authors who were signing books, and many books are launched (and sold) on this day.
So, for a while, I think this blog will be quiet. I will post when I have something to share.
beat the competition and meet the
-”she was a great woman I guess.”
My Queen does not boast.
Our mission statement is that we'll have a LOT of fun creating paper (and other) projects and just hanging out (even if it's electronically) with each other. We will grow as card makers and crafters. We would do this by participating in the challenges, discovering new techniques (possibly from tutorials we could post here), and learning from each other.
Did anyone else blink and lose the entire month of February? I don't know why February seems to fly by so fast. Maybe it's because January always seems to take forever, and after that any month feels faster. It's one of those mysteries of the world, I guess.
The only small negative was the speed at which the first few courses of dinner were brought out, we went into the dining room early (we were shown through) and didn’t all finish our G&T’s then the courses were cleared with speed, Kim was still mopping her bowl of the first course as our plates were being cleared. We did ask the waiters to slow it down a bit and they did so.
Fortunately for us, God has provided rules for living—the Ten Commandments—that restrict these desires so that they don’t harm others. The Law helps to make harmonious social life possible. Rules make civilization possible—no rules, no civilization.
And while yes, our team currently is smaller than the brunettes, don’t think that Team Blonde isn’t ready for the competition. We have awesome coaches and will spend the next few weeks getting prepped to show up on the 16th.
1. The Contrived/Forced Way (not recommended) – You write the scene and during the course of the argument the girlfriend spills a secret she has been hiding in a long, detailed sentence that just happens to detail everything the reader needs to know. This is the less subtle way of revealing the secret.
This is the proudest moment of my cooking history (as short as it is). This Crème Caramel above is definitely not the most perfect (look at the pesky rips and bubbles in the custard) nor the most artisan caramel pudding around, but I am so so so proud of it because I can now make it for my mother who loves this. :)
What does this mean?
watching - raindrops
Today... is a good day. I hope wherever you're reading this from, you too are feeling a little bit of that.
That stands for Millions of Unusual Small Creatures Lurking Everywhere, people! And while they weren't strictly horror, per se, many of them were surely strange enough and gruesome enough to fit the bill.
I must admit I don’t see any others coming on pool side with a laminated swim session print out… but it works for me.
Wishful thinking you may add.
Though technically illegal in India, poor families living in rural areas often rely on these types of partnerships, using kids as pawns in order to provide more financial stability to those who can’t afford to feed their children long-term. The fall-out is hardest felt for child brides, plucked from their parents’ homes in their teens and forced to live with the husband they wed as a toddler and his family. The girls are expected to play the role of obedient wife and daughter-in-law, and in some instances, are beaten into submission by members of their new family.
The July rally, dubbed Bersih 2.0, was the second mass protest held by the group and prior to yesterday’s announcement, talks were rife that the polls watchdog was planning to hold a third.
Maybe it’s just me.
thats just stupid.
Speaking of her, how about I share another fun video that I took a couple of weeks ago? This is what we wake up to every morning! It's the best alarm clock ever! :D
-Wolverine sends Deadpool into some sort of high tech assassin dealership, where they customize assassins to go after particular targets.
looks like it is getting put on hold. Dh has not met his deadline on the bathroom which was supposed to end on the 5th January and is not anywhere near finished, and this mean no H.E until the noise stops which may or may not be sometime in the next month :( That's just the bathroom. The kitchen is next and will be a huge upheaval. I am wiped out, totally shattered and feeling a bit flat with it. The ongoing mess of tile dust in the kitchen ( he cuts them in there ) and not begin able to go in the kitchen all day cos of the tile cutting and machinery on the floor, then trying to cook food after cleaning it up everyday is getting me down. I've given up on the dust everywhere else. There is a new bathroom suite in the front room and D sits on the new toilet to play his Xbox games which makes me giggle every time I see him, and a bedroom has the new kitchen in it. In retrospect my 5th January finish was overambitious especially in view of his arm injury and the fact it was Christmas for a lot of the time he was doing it.
Once home, ironically, her ex-boyfriend tried to re-kindle their relationship after he had slept with her best friend.
So, during the summer season while attending festive outdoor events, take the necessary steps to protect yourself and your family. Always wash hands before handling food and/or before eating. If you suspect that you or your family may have contracted a foodborne illness please contact your local health department. It is important that food safety steps are followed so the food served doesn’t make anyone sick. Try to cook-serve, which means limiting the amount of food preparation performed off site.
Various crafts have come and gone through the years. In college, I learned quilting, needlepoint, crewel and counted cross stitch. After my daughter was born, I learned smocking and made pretty little feminine dresses for her. When my son was born, I was a stay-at-home mom and I delved into many crafts, including basket weaving and candy making.
The Cenobites make a deal with her that they’ll let her live if she brings them to Uncle Frank, who escaped from their torture dimension place, because yeah, these guys look like they’d be the type to make deals…and also, how come these guys can't just find Frank themselves? It seems like they should be able to, given all the other stuff they can do! Are you really telling me these intergalactic torture aficionados with magical powers can't find one little escapee from their dimension? I'm sorry, I just think it's a little silly that these guys don't take any precautions in case this ever happens. Sure, you could say they never thought it would - but no; these guys seem way too smart to even let it happen, let alone be so incompetent that they have to rely on a puny little human to help them recapture their prey.
Next the umbrella allows the user to get out and about no matter what the weather. Likewise, a boss that enables their team to act independently creates an environment conducive to individual growth. Some exposure to the overall organization allows people to be seen by those above and to see the broader organizational picture.
‘The court observed that iiNet had no direct technical power to prevent its customers from using the BitTorrent system to infringe copyright in the appellants’ films. Rather, the extent of iiNet’s power to prevent its customers from infringing the appellants’ copyright was limited to an indirect power to terminate its contractual relationship with its customers. Further, the court held that the information contained in the AFACT notices, as and when they were served, did not provide iiNet with a reasonable basis for sending warning notices to individual customers containing threats to suspend or terminate those customers’ accounts.’
I guess it's a book called AMATEUR DENTIST, because she suggests pulling all the horses teeth. The horse runs away. Stupid horse! Don’t you see the book?
of a plastic bottle, i.e. store bought, loaded with the SLS chemicals and
Maybe he’ll succeed. I’m imagining
It is hard to look at the above evidence and not think that this race is going to be extremely close. The Democrats have put up their strongest candidate (except Bart Stupak) who is running in a relatively new district against an unpopular incumbent that is struggling to raise money.
and ears out flopped like bowlin' pins
Maybe dull is over-strong. Why is it so consumed with what punctuates the traveling? The throw of a one and the sudden switch in mode to encounter. Or the mysterious appearance of a site of interest, the burned out, ivy-choked shell of a tower and the like. Granted these can be exciting, the stuff of great sessions.
Thanks for stopping by today and giving me the perfect excuse to not mop!
"Sure, we could stop it, Chase, it we wanted to. But this city's been waiting for a Second Avenue subway line for a long time, I'm sure you know. The thing's mostly doing a good job with the tunnel, so they've been stalling, and I guess trying to negotiate to keep it underground. The degree of damage is really exaggerated."And soon the machine—known as the "tiger"—is spotted rooting around the city, sliding out of the subterranean topologies it helps create, weaving above and below, an autonomous underground object on the loose.
Happy Valentine's Day sassy friends. Here's hoping that you are enjoying chocolate, flowers and a super dinner away from your kitchen!
I suspect that these attacks have far more to do with TAA’s attitude and points expressed in videos like these…
Add the cashews, orange zest, soy sauce and sesame oil and continue cooking for one minute. Transfer to warm plates and serve immediately.
Letting them off the hook? Nope? That’s not up to me. If they are to be let off the hook, they have some action to take, which includes repentance. And only God can let them off the hook, though as long as they live they will endure the consequences of their choices. Now, I know that it may appear that they’re not experiencing any consequences, but we can’t see the torture God may be working in their souls. And they’re certainly not going to let it show if they can help it. But it’s not unusual for these people to turn to a variety of behaviors to try to numb the guilt and try to kill the compulsion to repeat the offense. Think of heavy drinking, drug abuse, sex addictions, serial “relationships,” loss of family and friends and certainly of self respect. They are living every day with the fear that someone will find out about their “dirty little secret.” So, no, forgiveness in no way lets them off the hook.
All you have to do to enter is post a comment below with the title of a book I reviewed that you read and if you enjoyed it, OR post a link to my blog on Facebook and comment below "FB." The deadline is Dec. 9th and the winner will be selected at random. Good luck!
Other Posts in This Series:
So my careful preservation of the doll (along with carrying it around in a satchel of only the finest rocks) has brought her value to... maybe $3.00. Maybe. But I'll probably part with her at a yard sale for a buck and a half, if you do a little tap dance.
I had an appointment today. While I was waiting, I received a call from my boss. I should have sent the call to voice mail. I should have ended the call when it was my turn. I didn’t. The technician who was helping me asked me once to end the call. I didn’t. I kept talking and talking.
But I read the piece, and spoke to the reporter, and – while always remembering that I am no more an astrophysicist than I am a black belt in tae kwon do – it sounded pretty solid. Dr Richard Fisher, the director of Nasa’s Heliophysics division, is very clear in the quotes, and our reporter, Andrew Hough, was very careful to check his facts with Dr Fisher before publishing. It sounds like a lot of serious people think that this is a real danger.
Big Thunder Mountain (in Frontierland) is probably the loudest roller-coaster in the park. It is a memento of old American Western Films spiced with a coal mine atmosphere. It doesn’t give you a high adrenaline shock, but the panoramic view of the park and the steep drop at the end can be a real thrill.
SECTION-A: Immigration and Assimilation
I said to my teacher that I could have done just the same and make a ton of money like him. She responded by saying: “Yes, you could have done the same, but he had the idea first!”
And of the no-bid contract.
"I haven't got MS when I'm looking at my pictures and I haven't got it when I'm drawing them either. It gives me an ability to express that fear."
Not breaking with any trends in my life in general, I ended up looking like a fool anyway. Yeah, uh, turns out one does not need a high-priced baby food maker right away if one already possesses a food processor. And boobs. Who knew? When I mentioned that I really had no idea what I was doing when I went bananas on the Target website, my friend Meagan looked me dead in the eye and said, “Yeah, I could tell.”
DOJ has acknowledged the closing, and said it’s a good move.
- The recipe calls for two kinds of flour; one third of the flour is specified as "white rye flour," a double sifted flour with the bran and germ removed. I didn't have any of that kind of flour, so I used some medium rye flour that I had on hand, and stirred it through a sieve to remove the coarser bran particles.
I visited York brewery on a Twissup earlier in the year. Their Centurion’s Ghost ale is great (I wrote about it here). I can force them into a nutshell with this: two flagship session ales, both with pale malt and crystal malt, both with challenger hops, one is called “Guzzler”, the other “Yorkshire Terrier”. Yeah?
Obviously the artists fascinated me too – the first Avengers cover still gives me a thrill with the fairground barker copy and sensationalist headlines (they still had to sell books) and the modern edge to the art looked fresh. Avengers has been through hosts of artists over the years but no-one touches my all tame favourite John Buscema. His was a sinuous and fluid Avengers of its time at once fresh and classical.
I started on Singulair last August, and I suppose the first symptom I developed was fever. Unfortunately, I didn't notice it at the time because I already had a fever. When I went to the doctor in August, it was for a sinus infection and fever, and that's when she put me on the Singulair. The other side effects came along a bit later.
You love your blanket with the bear on it
“There, there, Emily!” I said, pulling her gently to my bosom with a long hairy arm. “You must be brave and fulfill your destiny as a pedagogue and a woman.”
Oh, and PS, let's not forget my claim for DLA was rejected, social services can't help me and there are no descriptors for ESA that would mean I qualify. According to our politicians, I'm just fine.
Thanks, Ari. For everything.
I will love you and let you in.
Just think… all races have "so-called" rights, but not if you’re White.
To the north-east of the pyramid, is the ‘Templo de los Guerreros’, the temple of the warriors complex, which consists of a large stepped pyramid fronted and flanked by rows of carved columns depicting warriors.
But Jackson isn’t deterred by that reaction, noting that moviegoers will get used to it once they see it in its totality the way he has grown accustomed to the 48 fps watching dailies and editing various cuts of the movie.
It is no coincidence that Nick Glibb and Miriam Rosen are new to their jobs, and want to make names for themselves. UK education is, as I have said before, a political football which is always being kicked around as in need of reform. It never seems to occur to people like Glibb and Rosen that things might improve if there were less shake-ups and schools could get on with teaching.
Gives you a clue.
Let my brain rest in pieces.
Back about 13 months ago, Flo asked me to speak at the Good Vibrations Unschooling Conference, and I have to say I was completely overwhelmed. My primary thought was “why me, what makes me deserving of this honor?” And all of that sounded very nice, and humble, but for me humility often leads to the next logical emotion - total, complete, and abject fear. And when the fear caught on for real, my question was “What the heck will I talk about?” I assumed that Flo wanted me to talk about what I often write about – finding the balance between being an unschooling Dad and having a job in corporate America. When I approached her about it, she simply said – “Talk about whatever you want. Whatever you are passionate about.”
“O” – I wish to express a strong emotional reaction such as surprise, shock, pain, or extreme pleasure.
there is no independent reality
This one's just for fun! I have absolutely no (well, maybe one) DeNami sentiment stamp, so I saw on their blog someone had hand-written a sentiment. So I decided to have some fun. What did the first swan say to the other? "Hey, I used to think you were a duck!" Corny, I know, but fun. The rest of the inside greeting says,
235I wake--no more I hear, no more I view,
I hope you will enjoy watching! ;)
Not So Perfect is a masterclass in flash fiction. Each story is a small gem and I found myself sitting and staring into space in amazement after each one. Luckily, I was able to ask Nik all sorts of questions about his craft which I can share with you now.
Writing a historical (if fantastical) novel set in the mountain South, I wanted to explore this diversity of cultural and economic backgrounds. It connects to a host of issues that are still relevant today: class tensions, land preservation versus economic exploitation, the ongoing struggle between native and newcomer. My Auraria, while host to moon maidens and singing trees, is more perplexed by the arrival of developers who want to build an artificial lake and a first-class resort. Dam building, whether for economic or recreational purposes, was somewhat of a mania at the end of the 19th century, and dam breaks were responsible both for great tragedies, like the Johnstown flood, and ironic inconveniences, like the break at Lake Toxaway. These grand projects, and the disasters they sometimes brought about, were a crucible of interactions between the rich and the poor, the changing and the traditional.
Patellofemoral pain syndrome is pain in the front of the knee. It frequently occurs in teenagers, manual laborers, and athletes. It sometimes is caused by wearing down, roughening, or softening of the cartilage under the kneecap.
Newport News police officials say an officer fired two shots at a pitbull after it attacked a child near a school bus stop.
The stack of recipes on my Winter Projects list is slowly dwindling and I'm finding myself spending a lot of time in the kitchen, which isn't too far fetched for me. I really believe food is my love language. I think it is my Mother's and Grandmother's as well. We like to feed people. You can't spend too much time at Grandma's without her asking, "Have you 'et' yet?". I love that lady.
It took me time to realise that it is necessary to respond to the blogs of friends even if we are not very much interested in their articles. This response will give them an inspiration to write better and is always an expectation and excitement for them.
Yates turns to Sir James; does he have his revolver ready? Sir James does. Let me see it, says the colonel. Examining the gun, he notes that it has not been fired in a long time and may not be reliable. Turning to one of the officers, he asks for a spare pistol that Sir James can carry in case the need for it arises.
In the outdoor Cafés dotting every corner.
How much do Yankees want?
First time out in blogland for this excellent early 60's set from the mighty Juan Amalbert and co.
I'm loosing faith in humanity. I thought we were all people able to feel compassion and love, no matter of age, country, skin color, health status or religious believes, but they more I see of this world and the more I understand that people only think of that, but they don't really apply it.
Every once in awhile, you need to play catch-up on the blog. This weekend, I cleaned my kitchen and re-organized my drawers. I must be in that "fresh start" kind of space. So in that same vein, I wanted to let you know of a few things coming up...
I wonder if the mainstream media have reported these fact yet!?
Prime Suspect
As a reminder, the REL study was described as:
(C)
Author’s note 16 December 2011: When this was first published quite a few people thought it was autobiographical. It isn’t. This was a piece of creative writing. I started with the phrase “Blues in the Key of Bourbon” running rings in my head. I wanted to capture the thought and look deeply into it to discover its secrets. Below is what I discovered.
Over the course of the last week and a half, the media has gravitated to the easy answer to why Whitney Houston is now deceased. All roads point to her history of substance abuse and her ex-husband, Bobby Brown. Well, lets keep in mind that the autopsy has not been released, so we still don’t know her cause of death. Also, according to industry veteran Jennifer Holliday, Whitney was introduced to illicit narcotics long before she met the New Edition veteran front man.
Better digital strategy. Better branding and marketing support. Better multimedia exploitation.
elementary, and then go to middle school for grades 7-9 with the same
200 gram fish maw ( soaked and diced )
Be sure to dry well with your heat gun!
“This isn’t about fundamental rights, Kayla.” Henderson said in defense of herself, but was stopped cold when Kayla looked at her–both her eyes and face showing a hint of madness.
I found some fabric latter stickers from Prima that was just the right shade of lavender and also a small mulberry flower from my stash as well as some buttons.
Tonight. But we won’t win honey. It is just fun to get in on all the excitement since it is so much money.
"The royal family is not willing to undertake its political responsibilities unless the prince ... has the necessary tools at his disposal," says Prince Alois.
I am deeply fascinated by this great big beautiful world everyday and the people shuffling about.
But I’m slightly concerned about motion capture and the trailers that I’ve seen have done little to convince me otherwise.
in a church soothed for a while.
Grade: C-
- 1 tsp. minced garlic
Years ago, under the Apartheid government, the South African government set up a road fund which was funded by a fuel levy. As a result, we had world-class roads throughout the country. When the ANC came into power they stole all the money from these types of funds which were set up to maintain the existing infrastructure. Then they closed their eyes and hoped that the infrastructure would take care of itself. Of course it didn't and soon the electricity infrastructure came crashing down, leading to electricity black-outs across the country which still continues today. During Apartheid, South Africa sold most of the extra generated electricity to other African countries as they had an over-supply of cheap, abundant electricity. Today the ANC can't even supply enough electricity to keep the country going. The next shameful ANC looting episode occurred in 1999, where over R60 billion was wasted on the Arms Deal fiasco - where a peaceful South Africa bought billions of dollars in military weapons and machinery that they apparently just had to have. Of course a lot of the money was used to pay off bribes and for the ANC to pocket via a re-routed payment process - and the weapons and machinery lie wasted today, apparently not needed anymore. There have been so many examples of waste, corruption and stealing by the ANC - too many to mention. The Soccer World Cup is another classic example, where the SA tax payers are still paying for the white elephant stadiums that lie unused, but where the ANC and their pals pocketed money through the tender process for the stadiums. The SWC - which was supposed to put South Africa on the map and instead impoverished the people even more. The latest ANC scam is the e-Toll controversy, where the ANC has used State pension money to fund a R20billion road upgrade in Johannesburg. The ANC, eager to continue with their pillaging of the country, set up a front company called SANRAL. SANRAL funded the upgrade with R20 billion from the State pension funds, without their permission - an upgrade which was supposed to be part of the infrastructure plans of the 2010 Soccer World Cup. After this vast spendathon on already built roads, the government informed everyone that the 'new' roads would be toll roads with an e-Toll money collection system. Everyone is now naturally outraged as tax payers have already paid for these roads via the still existing road fund. Now they have to pay twice, the second time via toll monies, collected by SANRAl. Once SANRAL pays back the borrowed pension monies, they of course get to pocket the interest for the rest of their lives. COSATU - the biggest labour union in South Africa, and also a government partner of the ANC - acted all outraged and shouted for strikes and mass action....only until it was revealed that they were part of the SANRAL consortium. They have now postponed any strike action against the toll road for a month until the court case has been resolved (yeah COSATU, pull the other one why don't you!). And this story keeps getting better. SANRAL have appointed a Swedish company to run the e-Toll system to the tune of over a R1billion PER YEAR in 'collection' costs! Yes, not a few million, but over a billion EACH YEAR. How's that for pay back to the Swede's for their support for the ANC during Apartheid? Now that the people are angry and openly hostile to the ANC, the ANC have run to the courts trying to legalise this stealing of public money and trying to get the courts to force people to pay the tolls. Ahhh, the ANC, champions of the Black man in Africa! How the liberals the world over were taken for fools. The ANC were only ever interested in getting their grubby paws on the riches of the country so they could live in luxury - bugger their fellow Black man. And in the rest of the world the liberals sit back smoking their big fat victory cigars, clapping each other on another hatchet job well done.
Well, one day last week after he got dressed he laid out the next weeks shirts he wanted to wear and was so proud of what he had done.
Well, there won't be any celebration today. Just a nice quiet day for me to rethink about the past and try to visualize what the future may bring. But most of all, to pause and remind myself of life's littlest wonders and magic to be thankful of...
Disagree with me if you wish, but to your own dismay. December 21, 2012 could still be the end of the world if we do not act accordingly. Superstitious or not, it could happen. And we are on the right track to destroying ourselves and everything on this planet.
It’s a June morning. Murphy is violently rotating his head back and forth like the Things do when I have the audacity to place a vegetable that is not a raw sliced baby carrot on their plates.
The next day I had e-mails—one from Joplin, one from Gurdon, confirming that. One guy said, “Yeah, I saw a Bigfoot,” and he said his family actually lived on the road where the Ozark Spook Lights showed up. He said they’d give people directions to the road. And he said he saw a Bigfoot when he was a kid and he hadn’t put the two together.
Thanks for stopping!
Here’s a good article by Chris Brauns on sensing and responding to your call to ministry. While some of the strategies don’t match up exactly with how we pursue our call in the UMC, there’s still much wisdom here to glean.
While like the Fang case, this case is expected to complicate US-Chinese relations (anytime a government provides political asylum to the citizen of another country is in effect a rebuke of that government), but the fact that the U.S. so far has neither confirmed nor denied Chen’s presence in the U.S. embassy helps provide space for quiet negotiation and perhaps a face-saving exit for China. Secretaries of State Clinton and Treasury Geitner, who will visit Beijing this week, would probably meet some emotional Chinese official reaction, but expect them to say little in public — so as to preserve the semblance of a multifaceted working relationship between the U.S. and China. If Chen would leave China, a la the Fang case, it would be weeks or months from now as a result of delicate negotiations.
In the end, I decided to hold my head high and walk in with the yearbook unhidden. If there was a chance for me to showcase my work, then I will accept it along with its consequences.
I’m implementing the edits to Grief: The Great Yearning my last couple of readers suggested, and I was doing fine until I hit this passage:
Well, that’s what I wanted. What I got was different. Johnson did manage to capture the kind of dopey, silly look of Picasso skulls, but overall, his scattering of objects disappoint. The same complaint could be made of this show as was expressed negatively of his first show -- the work does not advance past irreverent one liners. The work’s wit is easily exhausted by a terse viewing.
By the time of the attacks on Freetown and elsewhere in Sierra Leone during 1998 and early 1999, Charles Taylor’s alliance with the RUF and the AFRC seems to be beyond dispute. The judgment reviews how he provided assistance in various forms, including small numbers of soldiers as well as sometimes substantial quantities of weapons and ammunition. Some of this was paid for in diamonds. Again, nothing really surprising here. The big question – and the Trial Chamber only really begins to consider this at page 31 - is ‘Knowledge of the Accused of Crimes Committed in Sierra Leone’. The issue, for the Trial Chamber, is not whether Taylor ordered, directed or commanded the atrocities perpetrated in Sierra Leone - this is not established by the judgment - but rather whether he knew that they
Take a film such as Christopher Nolan’s Memento (2000). Is not the short-term memory loss of the protagonist not an incredibly apt metaphor for what it feels like to live in our post-modern age? And yet, rather than decry the death of memory, we need to wonder, why might it not be possible to find a love, a poetry, within such a world. The protagonist in Memento learns in the end to gain agency over his seeming powerlessness, but does so in a brutal manner. But might it not also be possible to find a way to love in such a situation as well? Rather than yearn for the past, might it not be possible to wonder if there might not be room for new forms of goodness and love in such a world? And might not film be able to begin to show us how this could be possible?
few members didn't want to keep playing, or had other commitments. Nick
Curiously, Mr. Gingrich’s remedy for a “constitutional crisis” (and for the record, we are not in the midst of a “constitutional crisis,” at least not if that phrase has any of the gravity that the Constitution itself has) is to radically politicize the Constitution. If you believe we’re in the midst of a constitutional crisis now, buckle your seatbelts. Strip the Supreme Court of supremacy in constitutional interpretation (a notion, ironically, with considerable liberal support), abolish the Ninth Circuit, and subpoena judges to explain their decisions to Congress – and we’ll be awash in weekly constitutional crises.
So I wish you good games.
Dr John Long, from the Natural History Museum of LA County, Los Angeles, who is a fish fossil expert, but did not contribute to the study, says, “This is an amazing discovery which overturns the age old image of coelacanths as slow moving fishes and shows the resilience of the group to come back in true fighting form after surviving the world’s most devastating mass extinction.
Small paper mache eggs
All participants too will go into the draw for a three-day pass to the Bangalow Music Festival. So grab your pen and paper, bring your appetite and get ready for a fun weekend of good writing, good food and good company.
Okay squizz list… Skype… Pinterest… Facebook… Adsense changes… Wordpress… sigh I better get started…
Dog: I don’t know why they made my bed round. Hard to find the exact right spot to lay down. Turning, turning, turning… there, dammit, almost had it. Just a few more revolutions… turning, turning, turning, drop now! Nope, not it… turning, turning, turning, oh hell I give up. This spot right here will have to do. Sigh…
Scarves: 5
I've also been working on trying to clean my house a little bit, since we are expecting a visit from Hannah this week. Needless to say, Caleb is VERY excited that his "bride to be" is coming for a few days :-) We are all looking forward to having time to get to know her better and to hear about all of the wedding plans she has in the works. Since Hannah lives twelve hours away we haven't had time to get to know her as well as we would like, so her visits are always special to us as we learn to love her more each time she comes :-)
It is an easy way to see a lot of an area in a short time. Plus, when you don't know where you are, you don't know how far you are going or how far you have left to go - and for me, that makes it so much easier (when I know the distances, I will play the numbers game in my head and that just makes the run seem longer).
For those of you that like to visit my blog – I’m so sorry I don’t post often. Between being the bookkeeper for our family business, and having my own going-very-well Etsy shop (thanks to any and all of you who have helped that along), and designing many items for Keri at Lake Tahoe Holidays here in town I’m very crazed sometimes and just am unable to post often. I try to do better ~ but many times fail miserably.
-Handmade bracelet
If Mike could live anywhere is the world where would he choose?
Galvion told us he is playing Pokemon: Red and is waiting for an old-fashioned dungeon crawler coming out in April
Serving and former US Navy SEALs have slammed President Barack Obama for taking the credit for killing Osama bin Laden and accused him of using Special Forces operators as ‘ammunition’ for his re-election campaign. The SEALs spoke out to MailOnline after the Obama campaign released an ad entitled ‘One Chance’.
Your office bearers like the corrupted generals of Chinese dynasties past are only there to enrich themselves and build dynasties of their own.
While the creative intersection of organization and design can seem challenging, it’s actually an opportunity to blend the two into a statement-making environment. When I buy antiques and vintage goods for my shop, it’s not always for the provenance or value of the items, but rather sometimes for the utilitarian purposes they can serve. I determine how to enlist these goods as foot soldiers in the war on clutter.
she saw that taylor didn't sit in santa's lap . . .
Afterwards we needed to get to my parents’ house, mum and dad were expecting us around 1pm for lunch, apart from food the children had fun playing different games in the garden, dad even got out the “going” game before we left, I bet that is a game you don’t see very often, and mum and dad still have one too, it really exercises your arm muscles, you won’t get bingo wings with that lol
After moving to Houston, getting married, and then having our first son, I felt drawn to sing at our church and be a part of worship leading as a background singer. I felt the calling, but I didn’t understand it. Even meeting with the worship leader at the time, I never would have expected him to ask me to sing with him and the team for the next two years. But, he did. That is when I began to sing, to really sing again. Nearly seven years ago. When the calling that God has on my life began to really become clear to me. I was a wife, a new mother of an infant and I was living in a new city. And, I finally started listening to the right voice.
A picture of me last year and now and how I have changed since then…
ME: "The Doe comment was actually about today. But Hunter called this a.m. to check on me and he made me laugh so I'm holding it together. May need anxiety meds."
Strange birds a-singing, or the trees
J. C. W. Brook – The Snowman Killing
“The weeks-long soap opera of finding 60 votes for the Senate health reform bill came to an end yesterday when Democrats “compromised” with Senator Ben Nelson (D-NE) on language regarding abortion coverage. After catering first to Senator Joe Lieberman, (Ind-CT), by removing both the public option and the Medicaid buy-in, Majority Leader Harry Reid (D-NV) then introduced a manager’s amendment that includes new language on abortion care–and a huge barrel of pork for Nebraska–in an effort to bring Nelson on board and get the 60 votes needed to end a Republican filibuster.” (From here)
Donald Young Gallery, Chicago
I also think it's a little funny that in 2006 when CBO reduced its projection to 5.0 percent, apparently they reduced it all the way back to the year 2000.
And that's it everybody. The Series to Reboot for Friday the 13th franchise in 3 bloody parts.
There are a few of us missing this week, myself included, but we will be back to normal next week …
Ericson A, Källén B. An epidemiological study of work with video screens and pregnancy outcome: I. A registry study. Am J Ind Med 1986; 9: 447-457.
However a world without money means that the whole nature of law changes too. We no longer have the issue of the guy with the most money buys the verdict they want by getting the best lawyer on the block. Lawyers will no longer be motivated by money, they might want to be successful but it will no longer be the case that Defending is more profitable than Prosecuting, so it becomes a level playing ground again. Lawyers will do it out of passion for justice and equality and not because of the pay. It will be about who has the best skills for the job, not what someone can afford. It will also cut out all the injury claims law firms, it will stop the spread of polices in schools, hospitals and the like that have to cover their ass so as not to get sued and preventing kids from playing games like conkers in case the school might become liable if there was the slightest incident. This kind of mentality can go; there are better things to be spending our time and energy on.
* Green 3D Sparkly Brads
There were so many deep sky wonders that I feared I would never get the chance to see – the Lagoon, Trifid, Eagle and Dumbbell nebulae, the globular clusters of Sagittarius, Ptolemy’s Cluster, the Butterfly Cluster… a myriad of double stars. I had read about these sights and seen the pictures in books and magazines but figured my skies were too bright or too northerly to see such faint fuzzies.
But this time I'm going to try something different. I'm going to follow the training plan for a 2:15 HM, whereas usually I just do the "to complete" schedule. The biggest difference I see between the two plans are faster per km paces, but I think it will be a good challenge for myself rather than just repeating the same training all over again.
Okay so here I am!!
I will share as soon as they do..
Both Forest City and BUILD denied they had made such promises, setting up a battle in court over credibility, with the crucial evidence likely individual testimony, rather than documentation.
Coming up the stairs,
Style Pitfalls – This may seem the easiest and most natural way to write plot and dialogue but this is often too noticeable.
"Quality is not expensive, it's priceless."
Are our hearts really all about the Gospel, or is our real and relatable church merely an easy way to gain friends? Are we using Christ’s body for our own gain?
I want to thank everyone who's ever found their way here and decided to come back. Thank you very much for joining me on my journey as I continue building onto my collection. It is the hope for year 4 of bdj610's Topps Baseball Card Blog that I not only show off more of my growing collection or give my opinions about the Hobby topic of the day, but also to inform, possibly to entertain, to show more cards that might have never seen the light of day, and to become a stronger voice in the hobby (this last one will take some time...).
Whether you’re still dreaming of “some day” or you’ve already begun your search, Jackie would love to hear from you. References are available on her website.
it? This is such a big year for us, and Spencer turning 30 is a very fun part of that. We joke about what an old man he is now :) But really, the hard thing for us to believe is that in the same amount of time that has lapsed from the middle of his mission to now (most of which we have been together) is the same amount of time until he is 40!
I can see the television series now – a Maxwell Smart or Barney Fife character – riding a Segway – as he battles diabolical conservatives hellbent on destroying the planet’s environment. Must-see TV.
I wish I could tell you that this was my one and only run in with Hula Hoop Genealogy. But it wasn’t. Yet another researcher attached one of my brick wall ancestors to another family tree. All of which got copied repeatedly. I once again started tracking down the original source only to find the guy’s website still working but it turned out he had passed away just a few days before I found his web page. This set off another search trying to find someone that may have gotten the source material from him before he had passed away. In the end, I was told that the gentleman in question had placed my ancestor in the family because he fit. Obviously, I won’t ever know why he made the connection he did. He may have had information that he hadn’t shared yet.
The Christmas Card ... Hallmark Channel ... 6 PM
Among the topics unearthed by the myriad commenters - the majority of whom appear to be of my generation - is whether anyone else remembers the colour test films of the late 60s and early 70s. Of course I do!
I’ve always been more drawn to and inspired by home-spun folktales than myths about all-powerful gods or super humans. I love the idea of adventures happening close to home, of the seemingly ordinary and domestic being transformed into the weird, miraculous, terrifying or magical. So it follows that I’d prefer to be the granddaughter of a wise old woman than to have superhuman powers, or be the offspring of a particular god or goddess.
Burger King uses hundreds of millions of eggs and tens of millions of pounds of pork annually, and its decision could be a game-changing move in the supply business as a huge new market opens up for humanely raised food animals.
No sickness, no secret, no chain is strong enough
18-Which words or phrases do you most overuse?
Great nicknames, stage names and dubbed titles have been a part of the music business for years. When it comes to branding a nickname, it can be a dicy thing with music marketing when you make very large claims before you actually get large. Still, musicians and bands can have fun with nicknames and it can help your social media promotion in different ways.
Didn’t think it would get much cooler than that.
Within a few weeks you will hopefully be reading a post about how delicious this turned out, in the mean time please pray to whatever fermentation God you trust in for me.
Ages ago, I'd post semi-regular posts with cool links and stuff I'd recently discovered on this blog. But, I fell out of the habit of doing so, and I've been realizing recently how much cool stuff I find online then lose completely, never to see again. So, I've decided to start doing (roughly) weekly posts, most likely on Sundays (just because I arbitrarily decided I want to do so on Sundays), with the cool stuff I've read/seen/discovered in the past week. Welcome to the first installment of the weekly link roundup!
So what shall I tell my audience about re-tellings next week? I isolated four vital components of a re-telling:
So evaluation forms are done – hooray.
8. Autism is not Contagious
I’ll also be comparing my e-text with the more readable hardcopy version of the poem which is now available: Koroneho: Joyful News Out Of The New Found World. Edited by Jack Ross. Preface by Ian St George. Auckland: The Leicester Kyle Literary Estate / Wellington: The Colenso Society, 2011 (a joint publication with the Colenso Society, for William Colenso’s Bicentennial).
I must warn this is very picture heavy so I do apologise. Also Miss Jones hasn't gone crazy yes my eyes are different to save time doing 2 different looks I have merged them into one.
cause money is the biggest magic spell put on the human race
Paper: kiwi kiss, chocolate chip (SU), heavenly white (PaperTemptres), designer papaers (EP)
I hadn't planned to go in the Guangzhou Museum, but it appears to offer from its upper balconies the best opportunity for a view. At 10 yuan (less than a dollar), even if the museum is a wash, what the heck. And it's a nice enough little museum.
Happy she and happy he
Had NRA member JT Ready elected not to "stand his ground" against himself--he probably would have not been charged under Arizona's "Stand Your Ground" law.
This truck was seen on Myrtle/Karas January 6th at 2:12 AM. A neighbor's vehicle was vandalized during this timeframe.
Are there any?
They hated the Lord to the extent that they demanded His death on the cross. Then their hatred was vented upon Stephen, a man full of the Holy Ghost. He, in acts 7:56, testified of seeing the Lord in heaven. They stoned him.
If you haven’t already noticed, at the bottom of each post there is a list of sharing options. You can share the post using email, printing, Facebook, Twitter, Stumbleupon, etc.
Members of Zingo’s gang, including Punta Punta, knock her out and leave her hanging from a tree. Two American tourists, a Doctor and a Dentist find her and take her back to their place. While out for a swim someone on a boat with a machine gun opens up on Honey. He misses.
5. Urban Flesh Market (Sarod by Zarina Daruwala)
"Verity Sharp meets the four-piece band Sigur Ros in their native Iceland and on their visit to the UK for the 2007 Electric Proms. They have sold two million albums globally and their haunting music has been used as a soundtrack on trailers for the BBC series Planet Earth. They talk about their unique sound and their film Heima, which chronicles a series of unannounced gigs in Iceland in 2006"
Last month I got one very important and very shocking/exciting/scary/heart-in-my-throat phone call that went like this:
One brief example is the story of Daniel when he and his friends refused to bow to the golden statue. They were thrown into the fiery furnace a horrible situation redefined by a missional God. When they walked out of the furnace alive they proved to all that their God was much more than a pretty statue but a living God worthy of all worship.
I did learn some of the interesting aspects of mail delivery in the winter compared to the warmer months. The most obvious one is the responsibility of the home owners to keep their walkways, steps and driveways clear so that the mail can be delivered safely. I was appalled at the conditions of some of the homes and how treacherous it was for Lisa and I to navigate the walkways. I took some photos of some of the better examples of poor maintenance on the part of the home owners.
As I proved in my last post, I'm no mathematician. And I do know the difference between correlation and causation. But it seems to me, reading these figures, that there is a very strong correlation indeed between the rise in alcohol-related liver disease and a trend for people to switch from beer to stronger drinks.
Whether you prefer one of Dr. Gregory House's more classic looks or the racy, exciting designs of either the House Flame Canes or the more recently used "Death's Head Cane," you are sure to appreciate these exact replicas of the walking canes used on the show! And remember, House canes will keep on giving as you keep on aging. Ditto for the House mystique. Remember, he's not dead, he's in syndication.
Some people are created a star, some are born a star, some are made a star and some people achieved stardom. Somebody like Daniel, he was taken into slavery but because the Almighty God was with him and he himself stayed with God; little by little, step by step, he became one of the three in the entire kingdom. According to Daniel 6 v 1-3 he was a slave at the beginning but at the end he was one of the best three, one of the ruling three in the entire kingdom.
Have a wonderful week bloggy friends!
and Mayflowers bring pilgrims. But do May showers bring? It is rainy rainy rainy. I kind of like it, of course, being the kind of girl who would rather snuggle up inside and eat cookies. But, since I no longer eat cookies, and have to leave in a few minutes to bring Mali to a dr. appointment, blah.
Hi again blog friends
As they say in Occupy Tortuga...
1. Your first novel FRANTIC has been a big success and congratulations on an engrossing read. The story features 2 very strong female characters in Sophie Phillips and Ella Marconi, both put under extreme pressure. Were you consciously aiming for this powerful dual lead or is that the nature of their jobs? How closely did you draw off your experience as a paramedic for Sophie?
A lifetime of internal dialogue and struggle was clearly visible on her face. Her deep-set eyes were pools of pain and suffering that she had endured all her life and especially in the last few months. I had thought her to be middle-aged on their first meeting. She certainly didn’t look in her mid thirties.
Each match takes place in an area that you may have encountered in the single player. You have a limited amount of supplies to use in matches. Medi-Gel will revive you when taken down. Thermal Clip Packs will reload your weapons. Ops Survival Pack restore health and shields/armor/barriers. The Cobra Missile Launcher can be used to deal heavy damage. You gain experience for each kill and performing feats like kill x number of enemies or surviving x number of waves without being taken down. If a player is taken down and doesn’t use a medi-gel you can run to their body and revive them manually before they are executed or bleed out for the remainder of the wave. There are three difficulties each spawning stronger and greater amounts of enemies.
Wedged between the tumescent guru being bearded by a prude
Their message was simple: “Don't chain your dog,” said Tamira Thayne, founder of Tipton, Pa.-based Dogs Deserve Better.
In working with teams from many types of businesses, I’ve found that if there are some common elements in place it makes it much easier to retain top performing people. They are:
B: The Atomic Monster/Nuclear Angst Era (the late 40's through 50's)
“So, sometimes things are easy for us and other things we might have a hard time with that takes us longer. And that is okay, isn’t it? We’re all make up of the same kinds of things but how we are put together lets us be good at different things.”
1. Combine all ingredients in a large bowl except the oil.Use your hands to mix thoroughly.Add oil in a slow stream and knead into a dough.
I’m not a fan of running. I have friends who run a 10K, half marathon, and full marathon. They inspire me, but I have had no desire to train for a long distance race. One of my friends suggested we run a race this coming December, so I decided to sign up for it. There are different distances for the races. I was going to sign up for 10K, but now I’m not sure if I can run 10K. I have other reasons, but I won’t go over that now. I know I have 4 months to train, but I am happy running relatively short distance like 3K every morning just to challenge myself. Even though it is a bit of a struggle for me to run, I hope to run a longer distance down the road.
You see, without Harry Potter there was no longer a universal literary touchstone, there was just Twilight (Financially successful? Yes. Good literature? To teenage girls and housewives with a disgusting attraction to Taylor Lautner despite the fact that he is the same age as their sons. Universal? Only if the universe is comprised entirely of teenage girls and housewives with a disgusting attraction to Taylor Lautner despite the fact that he is the same age as their sons). Then The Hunger Games entered the zeitgeist offering things that Twilight never even imagined—high stakes, a frank depiction of death that was suitable for adolescents without ever being dumb or dumbed down, a universal underdog story of a noble “us” vs. a dictatorial “them” and, finally, a female protagonist that kicked fucking ass because she was too busy fighting for her life, and the life of her family, to choose between the glowing, pretty boy vampire or the fit, shirt impaired werewolf.
All five told her two words.
Q: In no more than 100 words could you describe your position on whatever it is that gets you up in the morning. Your philosophy on sex, your position on breakfast cereal; whatever it is, I want you to state plainly your position! Please.
“What should young people do with their lives today? Many things, obviously. But the most daring thing is to create stable communities in which the terrible disease of loneliness can be cured.” Kurt Vonnegut
2,4-D is currently the 7th largest source of dioxin pollution in the US and is toxic to the eye, thyroid, kidney, adrenals, ovaries/testes, and neurological system. Agent Orange Corn is projected to increase 2,4-D use 50 times over.
While this form of training and development was adequate in the industrial age it is almost detrimental to today’s information age business panorama. Today technology is constantly adapting and upgrading to perform functions more efficiently and effectively.
Alice Coltrane: Pianist, harpist, organist and composer Alice Coltrane (1937-2007) turned her attention toward orchestral endeavors on these great Impulse albums from the early 1970s, producing a rich musical palette without ever sacrificing the spiritual jazz she had long championed.
* October 5th 2:00 pm to 5:00 pm - Sign In
Thank you all for the tea and sympathy.
We rolled into Baghdad and Kabul. We nailed Mohammed Atef and Abu Musab al Zarqawi. We nabbed Khalid Sheikh Mohammed. We captured several hundred terrorist prisoners, questioned them for a few years while they played racquetball and got fat on USDA Grade A halal food, and then let most of them go.
Da Story
I'm not going to ask why you blog, because I think we've all answered that question a lot! Instead, I'd love to know: have you ever experienced blog fatigue? And if so, how do you get back on track?
“No idea.”
I arrived home feeling out of sorts. I changed my clothes and went out to wash the car before dinner.
And all between those shores, and my ever running Mississippi with
Ruffalo’s Banner is initially introduced as a difficult mission for Black Widow. It’s her job to “bring in the big guy”. Nonetheless, when we meet him in Nameless Third World Village Number Three, we find a timid, kind and mild-mannered man you wouldn’t look at twice in the street. This is compared to the Banners of Bana and Norton, who you might cross the street to avoid on a dark night.
I was brought up a Catholic. I went to a Catholic primary school, then a Catholic secondary school. I was a good little Catholic. I did my first holy confession in grade three, my confirmation in grade six, about the same time I started playing recorder in the church ‘band’ (which existed of Sister Chanel on guitar and a few of us kids who could actually play recorder. We also acted as church choir). When I was thirteen I was inducted as a Lector of the Catholic Church, which means I did a short course and was allowed to read the readings in church, which I did, on roster in the parish for about four years.
Objection #2 – The bible does not teach that a man can forgive sin.
Blog: 156
Doesn't that title make you want to start singing some Britney?
I used DCWV All about Boys for background paper and Scallop
Gunnlaug answers: “I am eighteen winters old as now,” says he.
To me, this is true. People are always saying ‘leave me alone for some peace and quiet!’. But really, there can still be chaos around those that want to be peaceful. They just have to block it out in their mind. It’s quite simple really. Quotes like this fascinate me because of the way it is written. Many people are told off by others by the things they say. Although, sometimes you have to think about the way they have said it. Maybe if they said it in a different way then they might not have been told off. Just think about that next time someone says something you think you don’t agree with.
Pulling off a structure like that (much like pulling off a precisely designed circus) takes a lot of control, and control is what Morgenstern has in spades. For a book to really work as more than just a meditation on style, though, an author, or at least her characters, sometimes needs to lose a little bit of that control. Here's hoping that Morgenstern lets loose in her next novel and combines some of her wonderful descriptive skills with a little more feeling.
How can I get to know the bits of myself which I deny? The first step was realising that such bits exist in the first place. When I first saw Johari’s Window in the 1990s, it did not really speak to me. It was a great revelation to realise, in about 2000, that I lie to myself because I want to see myself as a Good person. One thing I sought to do then was find other motivations I might have to lie to myself.
Watch every bite.
I'll be heading out after the 4 night run in London, for a 2 week run in Melbourne... before returning to the UK for my national tour.
where's the kid?
Lack of Unity
The Alter and the Crown,
hit several Rebel soldiers who scream and stagger through
Inker: Jonathan Glapion
In my shallow but aesthetically-pleasing world, I base all of my hypothetical purchasing decisions on colour alone. So it is impossible not to go for the very sweet-looking matt-black Tiagra model. And for $1,199 it looks pretty good in the real world too.
"Time is of the Essence." This is a legal term that states if whatever needs to be done is not done within a specified time the contract will be breached. Lately, in the education realm this has begun to mean that a child who does not grasp something cognitively by a certain age will be behind his peers (and the less often stated consequence; he will NEVER catch up). I'm all for having children exposed to things and all for early learning but I don't buy into this whole time is of the essence scenario when it comes to learning.
It’s also interesting to look at the scene where Fanny first meets Nick Arnstein, and is instantly smitten. It’s clearly love… but not quite the moment that her first solo on stage is. And the whole story is about those two desires: for stardom and for love – are in conflict. I think it’s a great example of visualizing both the inner and outer desires.
In my WIP, my main protagonist is not a likable character (though I hope that readers will still care about what happens to her). She's manipulative, a snob, irrational and often a real bitch. In the back of my mind, I always wondered what had made her like that but waited patiently for the story to evolve.
The clay remembered when the cockerel had hatched, and the cockerel’s parents, and 300 years of fowl. It remembered the planting of hawthorn, and before, being baked into bricks and pipes, and before, being patted between palms and hollowed and smoothed and left in the sun and carried to water to soothe a child’s thirst.
So make a plan that you want to help him get reacquainted with true intimacy. Spend some time, perhaps a week or so or however long it takes, not actually making love. Lie naked together and get used to touching each other again. Look into his eyes. Let him experience the erotic nature of just being so close to someone he loves. Take baths together. Explore each other, and take things very slowly so that he can see that he can become aroused just by being with you. If you try to go too fast, you can push him into fantasy again in order to "complete the deed". Instead, spend some time letting him discover that he can become aroused once again by being with you. But this is much easier if there's no pressure, and if you spend a lot of time just being together naked, talking, kissing, and exploring.
D. Tuesday -- List those you will pray for on Tuesdays. (I pray for special friends, near and far away, on this day.)
"'Tis so sweet to trust in Jesus,
Outshine all art that’s been
“No, sir, I’ll be fine,” Kenny replied.
Recall Tom Dyche
Victims typically have many questions: Why me or why my family member? They often want to know the details of crimes, what else happened that they didn't know about, and most frequently, why the offender did what they did?
Rich Wolf.
In 1973 the man applied for and was offered a good job where he could use his skills and interests. He gave notice at the place where he had worked since 1968. When he showed up for the new job, he was told that the owner's nephew had been hired instead. Man was out of work for nine months, collecting unemployment and applying everywhere.
I returned a few weeks ago from my second of probably-annual treks to China on business. So obviously I need to post on the beer scene in China.
Babyboy. Babyboy. Babyboy.
Once buried safely into the ground with the worms and beetles as her eternal companions, her spirit surged back into her bones and she lay awake in her grand coffin, six feet underground. She took off her earrings, and slipped off the shoes that pinched her toes. She tore her dress to threads within the darkness of her tomb, baring herself to the wooden galaxy she now inhabited. She licked her acrylic lips and chewed off the vulgar scent of the paint. Her saliva that had been resting vaporously inside her mouth foamed like a volcano spitting liquid lava. She brought her hands up towards her face and wiped all the makeup off, using her own saliva as lubricant. She mangled her hair like a seven year old pageant princess throwing a tantrum, the texture reversing to its natural manner.
Ball (favorite)
I've been playing in The Captain's Quarters for about 6 hours now, and what have I got to show for it? One card. Yes, one. You see, it all started last night when I thought I'd lost my Memory Box ARBOSCELLO TREE die. This die:
If you are interested in ordering a scarf to support her please email me at bkphilipp@st-tel.net. I will get in touch with you and get your address and give you mine as well so that I can get the scarf to you.
But he described states and districts as still largely in an “R and D,” or research and development, stage of figuring out the best materials and instructional strategies to use.
I remember bringing it somewhere to show it to some of my indirect family members and other people who I know, and we tried to figure out what it was and who should we report the egg-like object to.
Soon I'll know what to do.
Not everything will go according to your timetable, not everything will go as you planned but hang in there and things will get better. Don't give up. Persevere.
"I Want To Be Your Driver"
Hi everyone! :D
Really it is a great old work out that is certainly involved to help Hinduism plus Buddhism, nevertheless meditation alone, is simply not a religious work out. frequent deep breathing is certainly established to quiet likewise this landscapes and the body. it could possibly transform your vigor and provide psychological clearness. And, one of many very most effective aspect of all of, it is going to give you support so that you can absolutely recognize your own personal interior knowledge. methodical diagnostic tests have stated that consistent relaxation can certainly minimize panic, raise the disease fighting capability, enhance get to sleep designs as well as enable inside anatomy's solution to anxiety.
When they dried she got to decorate her tree. The felt ornaments stuck to the felt tree on the flannel board. Magic! She loved that they did this. She kept arranging and rearranging her masterpiece until she got it looking just the way she wanted to
“India was the king in hockey when no one else knew hockey” – My class teacher, Mr. Devidas uttered these words when I was still in high school. India had failed to win an Olympic medal in hockey that year. These words echo in my ears whenever I see a Kabaddi match. We have been winning gold in Asian games ever since it was introduced and every other tournament where Kabaddi is introduced. A few other countries are catching up with this game and can one day assert supremacy over it. I would not like to hear someone say – “India was the king in Kabaddi when no one else knew Kabaddi!!”
1-¼ cup Sugar
Putting action to words, the CJA has endorsed the Table Mountain Declaration, aimed at abolishing criminal defamation and promoting a free press in Africa.
“I was okay with the Change rite, you know that, it’s just– aren’t you still feeling– weak from that? Wouldn’t it make sense to give it time?”
It includes skills like planning, organisation, attention being held and the inability to see the big picture. People with an executive dysfunction tend to focus on the small or minor details and miss the rest.
- I just want to be liked SADFACE :-( No, I write because I enjoy it and hope one day to do it on a semi-professional basis.
A white cotton cap on his head,
The turkey is in the oven and the table needs to be set. My sister and I are going to make some little arrangements with the last of the persian carpet zinnias and the deep red nasturtiums, cutting with reckless abandon since first frost can't be far off. My hands smell like onions and sage. I have slippers on. It's happening.
It's a real-life version of the brand's spring marketing campaign, styled by Brad Goreski (love him) , that stars a girl band in a tour bus styled out with the black-and-white "Japanese floral" print.
Delicious and healthy Veg Kut Teh
In 2000 the Government of Australia awarded him the Order of Australia Medal for services to the community and he has earned a Doctorate in Biblical Philosophy. Dr Pringle has also authored more than ten books and is a sought after international speaker.
picking southwards towards the heel yielded not a click but a rasp of bitten fingernail upon hardened skin as the south edge of the verruca was not as well-defined while picking westwards was entirely the opposite with a satisfying crisp crack
I held a discussion between my male self, my female self, and my inner toddler, chaired by my inner rationalist. My inner toddler’s contribution was, “I want to wear skirts, and I want to walk down the street buying stuff”. Even though I thought when I decided to transition that my employer would find some unrelated excuse to sack me, wearing skirts was eventually more important. And that employer in fact supported me through my transition, and I worked for them for another four years before getting a better job in another organisation.
On April 14th I had two encounters worth sharing. The day started out as any other. I lazily roll out of bed, later than initially intended. I turn on some music and go about starting the day. Like many other 23 year old American living abroad, I check Facebook and see what family and friends are up to at the ends of respective nights. Eventually I get out the door of my apartment complex, known as “The Containers” because of their uniform design resembling a set of shipping containers, stacked 3 stories high. It ain’t much, but it’s enough, and it’s been home since sometime last August. Since my graduate classes are all over, all that’s left is to finish developing and executing my master’s thesis research. Procrastination ensues…
I went out to lunch with my family, then my mom and I went out for ice cream and walked around the mall as much as she could manage, which wasn't much. I did discover that we have a Gap Maternity store in our mall, hiding out in the back of Baby Gap, which is awesome. We also have a new Destination Maternity, which is so convenient. I had dinner with my family, and got in a fight with my brother over taking him to the airport today. It was over some combination of him being difficult and me being tired, cranky and pregnant that ended up with me storming out of the house and refusing to drive him. I caved when he called me to apologize for being rude, so this morning I got up early to make yet another airport run, this time to LAX, which is a much more awful drive, especially on a Monday morning, and especially since my brother's dallying put us 45 minutes behind schedule. But, I was glad we made up and I was able to see him off. My mom cried as he left to go home to Virginia. She always gets teary, but today admitted she was especially sad as she thought of the possibility that this could be the last time she ever saw him.
Chinese New Year Gifts
09. Along Came Mary
In the slideshow below you see the flyers/posters I’ve done for it so far, they’re 4 in total.
* Note that episode 3 is his idea of going back to “normal” and we should probably be getting scared now
Dave Zittin, San Jose CA
I’m sure you’ve seen footage of safari’s on television, but it’s a much better experience in real life. The best is to go with a friend or a group of friends, book a few days at a game lodge and take a safari out into the wild park. You’ll go in a bus or a jeep, together with a guide and ranger, and you’ll see all the wild, amazing and dangerous animals you’ve only seen in the Zoo or on TV.
You can imagine how we are feeling, especially without any clear guidance to what is now legal and what is not, and what makes matters worse is that TUSD expects us to move forward and redesign our entire curriculum and pedagogy to be in compliance.
Lastly, Directive 2006/24 imposed on Member States an obligation for providers of publicly available electronic communications services and public communication networks to retain communication data for the purpose of the investigation, detection, and prosecution of serious crime, as defined by each Member State in national law. It also amended Directive 2002/58 by stipulating that Article 15(1) does not apply to data retained under Directive 2006/24.
Which I think is pretty good, don't you? I thought only ds2 would participate, so wasn't expecting to make three boxes, but the results are great. We haven't blown the eggs to go inside yet. I'm waiting for a good time to be enthused about egg-blowing. But perhaps there never is a good time to be enthused about egg-blowing...
Good times and Great GIFs were had!
As a thank you to everyone who has played along with our shinanigans we appreciate it.
Don’t compare yourself to others unless you are looking for inspiration.
On this piece of vellum, I embossed the corner with just a piece of the Impressabilities which I inked up with Dye Ink (CTMH Spring Iris Ink)-the Letterpress Technique. The dye ink gives it a soft look.
But we can still strive to leave him with nothing to overcome.
With charm, humor, and deep understanding, a Japanese American woman tells how it was to grow up on Seattle's waterfront in the 1930s and to be subjected to "relocation" dring World War II. Along with some 120,000 other persons of Japanese ancestry-77,000 of whom were U.S. citizens-she and her family were uprooted from their home and imprisoned in a camp. In this book, first published in 1953, she provides a unique personal account of these experiences.
They go to the palace and they are still walking in confidence even though the entire world as they know it is different. What exactly do they expect to find there? Anyway, a policeman shoos them away as it’s a historical monument and since they don’t know their asses from their faces, there’s mass confusion and hilarity ensues.
One of the most memorable jobs we had was as co-masters of ceremonies of a drag show. Jay and I had gotten jobs as waiters at a coffee house called The Crazy Horse, and the owner had a drag show as entertainment. He thought because we were twins that it would be fun to have us introduce the impersonators. One of the drag queens, Tish, who is mentioned in Martin Duberman's book Stonewall, was there the night of the raid. They dressed me up one night, and I looked like a cross between Martha Hyer and Peggy Lee.
There's been a bit of a struggle around here (in my head) lately.
I'm driving approximately 9 hours to visit girlfriend Mitzi this coming weekend. I look forward to having time together and so I made a few hostess gifts...I hate to go anywhere empty handed...old school manners momma taught me, LOL!
3. Tommy Makem Fantasy
Conservatism and cognitive ability are negatively correlated. The evidence is based on 1254 community college students and 1600 foreign students seeking entry to United States' universities. At the individual level of analysis, conservatism scores correlate negatively with SAT, Vocabulary, and Analogy test scores. At the national level of analysis, conservatism scores correlate negatively with measures of education (e.g., gross enrollment at primary, secondary, and tertiary levels) and performance on mathematics and reading assessments from the PISA (Programme for International Student Assessment) project. They also correlate with components of the Failed States Index and several other measures of economic and political development of nations. Conservatism scores have higher correlations with economic and political measures than estimated IQ scores.
until I’m tired of circles and want to revist that Triangle and see more perfect sqares with definitive right angles that make sense and comfort me much more than my mother’s embrace.
- Colton has been weaned on his flow to 2.0L and today to 1.5L
Here are the TOP 5 winners:
We enjoyed a couple of good pints before and after shopping, Thornbridge's Seaforth being very quaffable indeed and so was Windsor & Eton's Conqueror. Whilst I still dislike shopping at least the husband has a place he can leave me when shopping in this neck of the woods.
In recent months, other companies have announced similar policies.
I'm excited that spring is here/getting here. Picture season is starting up - and after a winter where I hardly took any pictures - I'm pleased that I've managed to book 4 or 5 shoots in the next 6 weeks or so. I really enjoy doing it, and it's a great way to practice and continue to learn. I'm ready to dive back into the swing of things. I'm hoping I can take some more classes this year, too.
In other words, she never stopped being our mother in life or in the afterlife.
4. What are your three favorite possessions?
I’d really love to see your comments on the projects I do and the ideas I have. I learn more from critiques than praise, but, honestly, I adore praise (and who doesn’t?).
Allow others to be involved
The 20-episode SBS drama will have its first broadcast on May 26th.
Dandelion Seeds – July
So, we have an incident in which a gang of around 15 males violently attack two other males for trying to prevent them attacking and intimidating various members of the public.
The perfect blend of pop, dance, and rock, Round & Round shows the band at their best. The catchy melody and superb production is enough to allow me to forgive the heavy use of an orchestra hit in the track. I remember actually hearing this a lot on top 40 radio back in the day, which was quite rare for New Order.
This morning, in the morning sun, the mountains looked gorgeous with their new white coats, and they were just brilliant in the west. I didn't get a pic for you right then -- it was a crazy morning around here -- but I did get one now. It's always a good day if I can see the mountains!
new kitchen counter tops
No/No-No
deep decades of roots
On the other end of things I have no end of stories of leaders who have become swept away by stress and also lost their focus. A particularly poignant example was a young employee of one of my clients. She came in strong, interviewed well, and showed huge promise. But once she started, she became almost paralyzed by fear of not living up to her potential. This was exacerbated by the high standards of her work group and pressure from her parents as well. She confided to my client that she wasn’t sure she could think any more—her brain had become “fuzzy,” and she wondered, just like my other client, whether she had any value at all. Most likely too many catecholamines going on in her brain.
Mia Farrow – The Purple Rose of Cairo
Saturn is just clearing its beneficial conjunctions to fixed stars Spica and Arcturus and moves back into full-on Via Combusta zone until next May.
Great. She didn’t trust me to go off and pick up some sticks.
He added: “You know that song, ‘I Got the Whole World in My Hand’? I sing “I got the whole world in my gut, got the whole world in my gut, oh poor humanity is in a rut, have no fear I will shove all evil in my gut…”
That observation notwithstanding, Elrich asserted the youth curfew would somehow be an effective measure against the seemingly similar gang fight scenario. The Councilmember was concerned that the July fight might be “indicative of a changing situation” requiring the proverbial new tool in the toolbox to deal with that: “I do think that stuff is a game changer if it becomes the norm. If it becomes the norm we need different tools.”
The Democrats ended the Iraq war. Now let’s see which of Bolton’s descriptive terms might apply:
The story is told entirely using testimony. Each of the relatively short chapters is an account of the disaster, told by one of its survivors. There is no dialogue, no interaction between the characters in the book, just stories about the people they met, the people they loved, the people who have died. From the outset, you know everybody talking has survived, so one potential source of tension and excitement is lost, yet Smythe’s novel delivers both thrills and emotion. I should imagine writing the novel in this way was exceptionally hard work, and the results could have been horribly stilted. Smythe manages to hold it all together, delivering a very effective piece of literature.
echo park papers ~ a walk in the park
If I can lay my head on your chest -
Gone will be the days when products are cheaper online than in-store, where customers go to shops to road test products and then go away and purchase them at a cheaper cost online. Retailers will provide transparency and in-store price matching there and then through mobile or in-store technology.
smoothly slipping
1 tsp pure orange extract
So begins the craziest story I've had the pleasure to read in a long time. First, I have to note: I don't like horror stories, never read them, and most especially avoid them at the theater. Zombies? They freak me out. So why did I read this story? EOS sent out a sampler of their books to reviewers, and as I was paging through the selections, I took one look at the title, and was ready to keep flipping pages. But for some odd reason I read the first page. Then the second page. And then, well, EOS had only provided the first three chapters, and by the time I'd flipped the last page, I was hungry for more. Brains! This book has a lot of brains, both literally and figuratively. It's a smart, gory, laugh-out-loud tale of sentient zombies on a quest to find salvation. Or do they just want brains?
the delight of every good parent to meet their children’s requests. Likewise,
By Inge Bronkhorst
In the land of ever always,
In this book I offer my own interpretation of the everyday, remembering Gran’s lessons and applying them to ‘modern’ ingredients. The recipes are simple and easy for everyday people and everyday use. Like my own favourite recipe books, I hope this book’s pages will become well worn with use in your kitchen.
are different species of song,
I had the pleasure of meeting Duane Ensing earlier this year and knew he would be the perfect candidate for our 'In Conversation With…' series because not only is he a very talented and creative individual, he is also a local!
What’s great about KATW is that it gives the local children hope and a place to play. When we were in Louisiana and Guatemala the kids were SO incredibly excited to try out the new playground that was made. Here are some pictures from Guatemala:
Whatever suffering you have chosen for yourself and whatever suffering you are inflicting on others, it can stop. You have a choice. But it takes courage. And discrimination or viveka, because people will fill your head with nonsense about why it is your ‘duty’ to suffer. They may have vested self-interest in that ideology or directly in your suffering itself.
1) Beautiful Sex and the Impact of Porn in Marriage Incorporating the use of pornography is as beneficial to your marital sex life as having a threesome with a disease ridden meth addicted hooker.
Christmas is coming...
I love absolutely everything about this room, from the parquetry floors to the 12 foot high ceilings, The recessed shelving for books and treasures complete with pelmet framing. The sheepskin rugs, the painted Louis furniture, the tufted tub chairs, the silk sumptuous fabrics, the turquoise vases and the grand sparkling chandelier! I know swags and tails in most bedrooms can look completely over the top but in a room this grand how could you have anything less? Ok perhaps I would hide the speakers.
I was a supervisor in the kitchen today. Last weekend was dad's timber frame class and on Monday, the tour of barns. Mom was left with over-ripe bananas and lots of orange juice.
This is Part 24 in a 32 part instalment thanks to an email I found when cleaning up my work emails.
the bottom part with Versamark (I did not color the cardboard shape) and
Next step is to identify a delicious but diet friendly cream option. I have tried probably a million different ones so if you have a question or need a recommendation… just ask! I am currently using CoffeeMate Natural Bliss in Sweet Cream at home, but I have the Light Vanilla version at the office. I love these because they taste great but are just milk and cream… no other weird non-dairy ingredients. I also try not to have a lot of artificial sweeteners in my diet, so this gives me just a touch of sugar / flavor without all the synthetic stuff. Other favorites include Blue Diamond Unsweetened Vanilla Almond Breeze, plain half and half, and the seasonal flavors of CoffeeMate (specifically Pumpkin Spice and Warm Cinnamon Sugar Cookie – which are sadly only available around the holidays).
Iron Man is an excellent example of what good popcorn entertainment should be - interesting story, solid characters, non-dopey comedy, and fun action sequences. I know nothing about the original comic, but I have to say that as a piece unto itself, the film version feels both fresh and entirely able to stand on its own. That's not something that's necessarily standard with any genre of adaptation, but certainly not for action/science fiction films. Jon Favreau has hit his stride as an entertainment director, and I hope that he keeps working on projects like Iron Man, starting with the inevitable sequel.
On our first day, we drove through the deserted desert of West Texas. The speed limit was 80, we didn't see many cars, and there was nothing on the side of the road. Noting this, Amanda asked "What would happen if we ran out of gas?" For hours, this was all we saw.
Like Andreas Kopke and Oliver Ganges Kahn before him, he has influence on the pitch and is a very fiery character.
If the mystery remains unsolved, and the door-gluing continues, he could always try appeasing his persecutor by leaving and entering through a window.
from the fifties in bags beached by the burn –
sketched & punched.
(Earlier live blogged/Edited) Sony Mobile Philippines presented to the local media and bloggers the first smart phone that carries the Sony Mobile brand–Xperia S at the local launching today in Cebu City.
from the “Occupy the Justice” rally in Washington, DC on Mumia’s 58th
MANY UFOS ARE FAKE
slate
Xypherous: Hybrids, such as Teemo, are getting the short end of the stick. We’ve revamped Kayle. We’ve castrated Jax. Hybrid champions hold the key to breaking the current meta, achieving fluidity and differences in champion selection. I can envision it: a fluid, ever-changing meta – the existence of multiple metas at once…
Annual Plant Sale (Wed May 7th - Thur May 8th) This is a great chance to buy plants and seeds while getting gardening tips from experts! Don't miss it!
9. Ugly Inside
Rating: three napkins
An interesting thing about Victorian food is, aside from the cheese course and the occasional (lower class) cheese pie, there is remarkably little cheese in the recipes I've encountered. Bazillions of eggs, but cheese . . .
Sometime within the past year a Holiday Inn has been erected adjacent to the highway in a nearby town. That’s my whole story, folks. I took a part of your day, and you’ll never get it back now.
Thursday, August 23
Health & Wellness Fair - I would love to see an event that would focus on healthy living. Information on heart health, diabetes, arthritis, maybe a blood drive, and ways to get more fit, active and healthy through groups in our church.
I love making frittatas, but her recipe for an asparagus, goat cheese, potato frittata involves a slightly different method for cooking. All I can say is that I'll be making this again soon! Full of such flavor, so good! And it has been a perfect leftover lunch yesterday and today.
Ghostface is another matter. Like all of the great monsters he's simple enough to pray on your sub-conscience, yet iconic enough to be instantly recognizable add that to the way his appearance subtly mocks his victims...
2 shape
Overall, it’s been in my bag for the last week or so and I wear it all the time. It’s flattering on my skintone, is moisturising and feels like a treat as I had to purchase it in Manchester as you can’t get Look Beauty in my local Superdrug (boo!!!) Because if I could I would be trying much more of their stuff.
Beautiful sites, wonderful music and marvelous food.
Holding each other accountable.
Even when that change is devastating.
One minor complaint I have is that the controls can take a little getting used to (not really a big deal). Also, the camera can be finicky at times, but it's by no means a game-breaker.
This research doesn’t bring solutions to the hunger and injustice in the world. So, what is the point of it all? could be considered the most honest and poignant question. This already has brought me vast amounts of interesting ancestors which I can boast about at parties, but I won’t unless someone challenges me to it, in which case I will most happily dish up the various serial killers, patrons of the arts, popes, writers and warlords – just for sport.
What I do know is that the guy at the hobby shop was pretty stoked. He gave us fifty bucks for the final mementos of Jeff’s youth. Hopefully the toys will find a good home and spark the imagination of some young kid. And for you enthusiasts out there; don’t worry. They were 1990s replica Star Wars toys. Not the originals from the 1970s. I’m not that hasty.
This verse will be the foundation for a series of blogs. I’m going to go through some of the characteristics that Peter lists here and I’ll try to break them down for you.
“Laurel, sweetie, don’t get excited….”
The Directorate of Inter Services Intelligence (ISI) is Pakistan’s premier spy agency and is better known as the Eyes & Ears of Pakistan Armed Forces is so feared by our foes and revered by our friends.
A: Face south and then turn 180 degrees. Contact us when you get here and we'll send the rest of the directions.
We became friends, he helped me see that my relationship with Steven had to end.
The incident on the pride of Air Canada jets happened way back in 1983. I remember the actual day it happened. I poured over the news reports and later the official reports trying to learn how in that modern era, a high-tech long-range plane, like a 767 could run short on fuel on a domestic flight in good weather while crossing southern Canada. I am amazed at how it successfully imitated a 173 ton glider.
I am very good at removing ticks.
2) Worried Life Blues
Aren’t kittens awesome. I mean like cats in general to be honest, all fwuffeh and cute and slinky and tired and stretchy and shit. Like I said. Awesome.
San Francisco Bay Blues
Midway I noted that the leading was running out and so simplified the design.
I know some of my friends would ask how I could reconcile this attitude towards nature and wildlife when I am in favour of shooting. On a farm like that one, small shoots are held during the season, and Sir Pheasant, who I’ve been writing about with such affection, becomes a target. While I’m desperate to go, I’ve not yet actually been game shooting (one day… one day) but despite my lack of experience and my appreciation of nature, I will still defend it. The shooting industry is actually responsible for an awful lot of conservation of the wildlife and habitats involved in shooting (see BASC for more info). Birds are bred specifically for the sport, and are looked after from birth – after all, a weak bird that can’t fly a good distance, for any length of time or with any speed makes for a very poor target. Anyone who takes issue with game shooting should consider the source of the meat they eat from their local supermarket – I for one would far rather eat a bird that’s lived its life outdoors and been shot mid-air than a battery farmed hen. It is very possible to appreciate the elegance and comedy of the puffed up pheasant strutting his stuff on the farm, the challenge he provides as an airborne target, and the flavour of the pheasant breast wrapped in streaky bacon on your plate at dinner.
Kit includes:
After the meeting, Senator Afrasiab Khattak told reporters that the human rights situation in the province was serious and issues of missing persons, growing incidents of kidnapping for ransom and targeted killing were lamentable.
I’ve never seen someone fall so hard.
And she is waking up between 4:45 and 5:45 every morning, with 98% accuracy.
1 scorch
As if these little balls of toxins were critters! If my body was a house, this dancer just cleaned out the attic. It was painful, but it was spectacular all at once.
giving me 30 days to clean up my act.
NEW YORK– Public Advocate Candidate Bill de Blasio will hold a press conference with Council Member Letitia James, Assemblymember Hakeem Jeffries and other elected leaders at the Clinton Hill house where an army veteran was shot and killed by an undercover police officer last weekend. De Blasio will join local leaders to call for new reforms in order to ensure greater accountability in response to police shootings.
One of the people they talk to is guest star Jennifer Coolidge! Jennifer plays a character named Sophie Kuchenski, who the girls’ suspect is running an illegal business in her apartment. So what do the girls think she’s doing? Read on for tonight’s recap.
Of usefulness, contentment, and success.
Snake oils? Maybe…
Jett just got his orange belt in Karate and Wynn is close on his heels. Wynn is a lead role and soloist in their school play this next week so he is REALLY excited.
This year’s primaries, the 2008 primaries, the General Services Administration scandal, even the Secret Service and Donald Trump were among the targets for presidential barbs. “I had a lot more material prepared, but I have to get the Secret Service home in time for their new curfew.”
Frank Terpil would be convicted in absentia to over five decades in prison. He would supply weapons to the Arafat wing of the PLO, turning up later in Lebannon, Prague, Nicaragua, Grenada before the US invasion, Prague again, and finally, Cuba, where it is believed he is under house arrest with no plans for extradition to the US. At a meeting with Cuban exiles that went awry decades before, he would ask, “Who needs those dumb spics anyway?”
A friend was visiting KL and staying at Doubletree by Hilton, so we suggested that he looked out for Tate since it's a cool watering hole. He eventually found it and liked it, so much so that he went back there two days in a row! (not sure if he's been back since our visit together)
Last week it may have been the Grebes that were taking centre stage but yesterday and today it the Oystercatchers that have it. They know its spring and they are telling every one else.
Whatever support means to you… get as much of it as you can.
But then I guess thats why I love him so much!
In the past several months, my conversations have become increasingly consumed with medical terms: diagnosis, prognosis, doctor's orders, and the like. As I confer with nurses and try to understand the needs of my 81-year-old mother, my vocabulary increases as well. New words are beginning to flow from my mouth as though I've known them all along. But I also find myself saying things I wish I hadn't said; and not saying things I wish I had. Have you been there, done that?
This must have been how Childa felt the first when she began cheating on me with that idiot boy, I reasoned to myself. Nervous…maybe nowhere as nervous as I felt but, I hoped so. Otherwise, there is really nothing left worth staying for.
Various fabrics, wool, and buttons
My girls gave me Walter Issacson’s biography of Steve Jobs for Christmas. This was a book that I was interested in reading since always considered Steve Jobs to be an intriguing character. I’m only a 30 or 40 pages into the book but it is already hard to put down.
Stir well.
In 1999, the U.S. abandoned use of the live virus oral polio vaccine to prevent individuals in America from being paralyzed by vaccine strain polio. 11 A lot of people don’t know that, if you swallow the live virus polio vaccine, you can get paralyzed and die. On top of that, recently vaccinated persons shed live poliovirus in their body fluids for weeks. People who come in close contact with them can get vaccine strain polio and be paralyzed or die.
Sam McFarlane has gained the San Bushmen’s trust in pursuit of meteorite rock. A helicopter appears and he is left alone as a stranger approaches him. It’s Palmer Lloyd, the fourth richest man in the world. He tells McFarlane his former partner, Nestor, has died and he wants him to finish the project Nestor was working on. He’ll get $75,000 for 6 months work plus a lifetime job at Lloyd Museum.
NARS Sheer Glow - Gobi (applied with a damp beauty blender sponge)
And that's where I took these photos.
-The Russians in Nashville love to drink
We left the subte at San Juan and just sort of meandered until we came across Carlos Calvo. Something stirred in my memory “wasn’t Carlos Calvo the street with the café that made its own bread?” Viv confirmed my thoughts so we walked down until it was crossed by Peru and there on the corner was El Federal. It is quite a big place, but always full of customers. We managed to find a seat by the window and we were given the menu. This particular menu, I think was written by Tolstoy, slightly longer than War and Peace but a mouthwateringly good read. I think we spent longer on the menu than the food. We elected for a sandwich each on their pan caseros. We saw so many other dishes served up that looked equally delicious but I could not come to San Telmo without tasting their bread.
The next league won't be until Autumn I imagine. I don't know what team I'll play yet- thinking about High Elves, maybe Pro Elves, maybe Skaven.. something faster and more agile since I've been playing more hitting teams lately. Although I had an idea for minis for a themed Nurgle team.. and also a Chaos team.
only you can make the change
Za’atar – Flavour Genie in a Bottle!
She sat up and looked at me. “Do I look like I know cause I don’t” she said in an agitated voice. “But I do know how many men came to visit me everyday since I started, 59. Do you wanna be number 60?” she reached for my belt buckle.
Mandy entered the room with three bottles of beer and bare feet. She handed a bottle each to Hank and Dee and kept one for herself. Hank put his bottle against Mandy’s exposed back just to watch her braless nipples peek through her beige halter top that he had picked out because a peripheral glance would sometimes fool him into thinking she was topless. As Mandy leaned into a practice shot, Chris thought about the well, Hank thought about getting some new suits, and Dee thought about tugging the thong that peeked out of the back of Mandy’s jeans.
Article 15 An agriculture administrative department of the people’s government at the county level or above shall work out a plan on the pollution prevention and protection of places of origin of agricultural products and integrate it into its plan on development of agriculture and rural economy.
Diet: since I kept a record of what I was eating for the past week, I haven’t been grabbing that piece of cake. I went for Tim Horton’s donut bits. Not as many calories.
So Three things about myself:
On other hand if you allow and create change then everything else changes. Some of those changes might include:
Now we advance our latent and ampler hunger to fill,
Alison made clear to me in the most compassionate way she could that the Paula I knew, my friend that I loved, wasn't going to be there. The woman I was going to see would look like her, but she wasn't going to remember any of our history. She wasn't going to know who I was. Which for some reason felt okay, because I know who she is.
Listen. Don't let them drown on account of me. Use your common sense. You know the difference between a baby who truly has to be watched every second and one who is okay in there because there are so many others in that tub that they are all like sardines, propping each other up! So you, also on the spot, can scrub down the toilet and sink.
“We’re thrilled to celebrate the 20th anniversary of Kirby by releasing a special Wii disc featuring all your favorite Kirby games this year! Which Kirby games are looking forward to playing again?”
The main characteristic of socialism (and of communism) is public ownership of the means of production, and, therefore, the abolition of private property. The right to property is the right of use and disposal. Under fascism, men retain the semblance or pretense of private property, but the government holds total power over its use and disposal.
When I look at this 7 inch outside of the memories of wonderful music both bands created and how the label that released this influenced me a great deal, what I think of most was the vibrant basement shows that marked this era of Long Island DIY for me. The cover of this 7 inch is a picture of a room that I am sure looks familiar to anyone who went to DIY punk/hardcore shows on Long Island in the late 90s/early 2000s. The picture is no other than the basement of "Ren's House", one of several DIY show spaces that Long Island in that time period. Ren, who played guitar in Sometimes Walking Sometimes Running, and his family allowed their home to be opened up for youths to congregate and make a racket but above all a safe place to express themselves. Every time I went to a show there it felt special. Some of the best shows that I have went or been a part of have taking place in that room. When Latterman went on hiatus after Turn Up the Punk We'll Be Singing guitarist Phil Douglas played the show in a bear costume. It was just always great. And generally speaking that was the vibe of Long Island at the time as house shows were very prevalent; from Ren's house to The Vargas House, Ryan Woodhull's house, The Hobo House, and a few other that come to mind. It all had a very powerful effect on me and I feel very fortunate to have been a part of something so organic, creative and liberating. These days it seems like the only cats doing house shows that I know of are the folks at Dead Broke.
Mendocino Brewing Company Imperial Barley Wine Olde Style Ale
1.) PREPARATION, PREPARATION, PREPARATION- Begin working on assignments early. Try contacting sources at least a week before the due date, and don’t wait until the last minute to complete a project. Starting early on an assignment allows for more editing time, which, in the end, will make for a stronger project. Plus, you experience a bit of pride when you’ve got your assignment finished while everyone else is stressing out about getting it done.
As we all know, a breech baby can be born vaginally; but complications may occur. Therefore obstetricians often recommend an elective Caesarean Section (CS), especially for first-time mothers. Things were very different before the advent of antibiotics, when operations were much more risky than they are today. My mother told me that when she was about 36 weeks pregnant, her obstetrician tried (unsuccessfully) to turn me by external manipulation. In recent decades, however, use of this technique (external cephalic version) has declined because it may occasionally cause complications.
'No. No. Its okay. For now. I'll call you if I feel worse... ' I literally croaked, choking on some vomit. 'I have to go now...'
For the next 2 weeks, each day you visit BizziMommi's Blog we will be featuring amazing products that are All Natural, Organic, and Eco-Friendly! We have some fabulous products that will be showcased as well as great giveaways where you will have the opportunity to win your own Green products!
What about your writing? Is there anyone whom you would describe as pathetic? Is there any character who might benefit from having pathetic elements added to his/her character?
*Ad rates are non-refundable.
Do you know what sets apart the ultra-successful from the average?
READING the Bible ... I'm using this 'read the Bible in a year' plan, for the first time. I guess I usually read the New Testament several times a year, and favourite other books like Psalms and Esther, but I needed a plan to help me tackle some harder books more systematically. I like how this plan has a different focus every day of the week.
Below is my entry into the contest. Please comment any feedback you might have. Thanks!
3. Man-pinion
Norway’s greatest author, and one of the finest modern dramatic writers in history. He had 6 chances to win, since the award was begun in 1901, but he lost due to arguments over Alfred Nobel’s eligibility requirements, as laid out in his will. He intended the winners to exhibit “lofty and sound idealism.” But from 1901 to 1912, the Committee believed that he meant “ideal direction.” Apparently Ibsen, the father of modern drama, was not leading the literary world in the ideal direction.
Always searching for someone else’s light to extinguish my darkness
One of the fun things about the Bead Cruise is the Bead Bazaar, Presentations, and Open Beading. There are nearly 60 people in our group and naturally they can't all take every class. So the bazaar is an opportunity for students to meet all the instructors. Plus, they can get beads and kits from the classes they didn't take and learn from the instructors they didn't get to be in class with through the presentations. I spent a good half hour talking all about coiling for my presentation... which led to selling out of the coilers I brought and I stumbled upon and FANTASTIC new idea for seedbeaders to add wire to their work. The talented Jill Wiseman is going to get on that little diddy for me. Cuz I don't do seedbeads. No way, Jose.
Paul simply notes that the resurrection body will correspond to our present body, but in contrast it will be…imperishable, glorious, infused with power—spiritual rather than natural.
These days I don't make a card without my Cricut! The cartridges used: Close to My Heart-Art Philosophy, Straight from the Nest, Cricut Craft Room Basics (free when you sign up here), Kate's ABCs, and Baby Steps.
So, last weekend was another busy one. One of the guys my brother played rugby with was getting married in Austin (a couple hours away from here), and my brother's girlfriend Stephanie and I drove up after work on Friday. My brother had to be there early to help cook for the rehearsal dinner, so Steph and I decided to carpool, and it was one of the funnest road trips ever. We got some Boone's Farm wine on the way out, and jammed to Journey, Eminem, and Guns N Roses on the way up. I had plans to hang out with Tara, one of my best friends from my hometown who now lives in Austin, so I headed over there after we met up with my brother once we got in town.
Even though we just started dating, I really have that sense that I just want to take care of him. I want to be able to do whatever I can and I wish he’d come to me, but I know it’s soon and this isn’t just like being sad over a dog dying. This is his dad (who may or may not be alive still).
It was awesome and I'm so very glad I went.
Sleep, cousin of oblivion,
Added toasted hazlenuts to the whole batter and powdered cashewnuts to the crumbs for a marzipany flavour....
But my colleague can just not imagine that a caddie would want to try and get a ball in such a dangerous place.
This is a similar argument to that used to legalise abortion (The CEO of DID Sarah Wootton comes with a wealth of campaigning previously for the liberalistion of Britain's abortion laws). If we do not legalise assisted suicide so that people can do it ‘safely’ they will do it ‘unsafely’. Debbie Purdy is a well-known pro-euthanasia campaigner with a chronic progressive disability whose life expectancy probably runs to decades. She has also said that she has no current intention of ending her life. It is interesting that Falconer should single her out as a case justifying a change in the law. It suggests that he wishes to extend assisted suicide and/or euthanasia to those who are not terminally ill. This would again take him beyond Dignity in Dying’s stated agenda. There is more than a hint here of incremental extension.
TO MAKE FLAVORED MILK SYRUP-
A note about the inks I used: My "honey mustard"is the new Lido ink from A-Muse Studio. It's a perfect gold. The "harbor" is Eucalyptus. I use a lot of distress ink on my projects and I have learned to distress the elements before I stamp images. Ex: Die-cut oval, distress, stamp with frame and rooster. I'm currently in love with Creamy Brown ink from ColorBox and typically add PTI Chamomile tea-dye ink on top as well.
Let me begin my review with a few lines from the book:
I made a pit stop in the bathroom and then climbed back into bed with the light still on. I was utterly shaken; disturbed. Eventually I fell back to sleep, but my mind was filled with the fright of the realness of my nightmare.
marvel of primate finger,
Speaking of protecting the earth, environmental laws do serve a purpose: they keep people from shitting upstream of others. Present bickering over climate change and pollution is not about a fascist takeover of the world, it is an attempt to define what constitutes shit, and where the boundaries of the stream are. Those downstream say “Stop shitting in my water supply” while those upstream say “Too bad, I can’t afford to build an outhouse.”
I’m not sure why they paired up Se Na with Tae Moo. They both have shades of the same thing but can’t we have someone else paired with them? It’s just too much of a coincidence.
when she apprehended my camera.
When I told Ryan I'd be making bacon cheesecake I think he gagged. He claimed they don't go together... I reminded him of Chopped. Plus, I thought this recipe looked really interesting. I love making recipes that are different, yet attainable, and easy to prepare. The caramelized bacon had such a savory-sweet-and-salty taste in contrast to the creamy, heavenly, cheesecake filling. The chocolate crust was my favorite part. I really loved it! I can't wait for Ryan to try it out when he's home from studying. I'll have to tell you how that goes...
Corrections Department’s Director-general, Pol. Col. Suchart Wong-anantachai told Prachatai that the investigation committee will be conduct autopsy on Ampon’s death, consisting of officers from Corrections Department, Attorney-General office, local inquiry officials and forensic medicine from the Police Hospital.
Preheat oven to 220F, and line two large baking pans with parchment paper.
This post is full of lots of random news. Nothing that will change your life though, so don't go getting too excited on me now.
If it weren’t for Maria de los The Cleaner (I’m not telling you her last name – I’m not sure she is legal), I probably wouldn’t have seen the Buddha to talk to him about all this crap. The Buddha was partially buried under a pile of mail and a manila folder labeled “Shit to File.” How rih-tarded is it to have a file of things to file on a desk full of clutter and unfiled papers?
Youthful and majestic, a lost Croatian queen, carrying
From the get go, the case provided great fodder for the media. Here were two attractive young ladies embroiled in an alleged “sex game gone wrong”. Pictures of the two were splashed across the world and the media dubbed Knox “Foxy Knoxy”. Straightaway, the label created connotations of sleaze and the impression stuck.
Sift together flour and cocoa powder in a mixing bowl. Add in sugar and salt..
The development of government was most likely caused by a large number of factors. Lack of communication over large land areas, the development of the city (city-state), and the need to make laws and create ways of assuring the city both protected and preserved its inhabitants. From its very inception however, the problem arises as to who is to make these rules and other decisions. Obviously there were those who considered themselves to be more worthy of the duty of “governing” (and possibly were), but then this leaves the rest of the population at the mercy of the beginning of what we would call today the “elite class”. This class is usually not only better educated, but has a greater leadership capacity, and think in more abstract ways. These qualities however, do not necessarily assure a public official with the good of society as their goal. Therefore, with the rise of the ruling class, we can see the beginning of the manipulation of power, and the precursor to the aristocracy that was created by the monarchy.
Well done both of you!
2. Mix vodka and creme de cassis in jug
Interracial rape does occur in America, but it is overwhelmingly an act of black aggression against a white victim, the main victims by far being young white males in US prison, but outside prison most victims are white females. The rape of a black woman by a white man is almost unheard of. Statistics from the US Department of justice show that, in 2005, over 37,000 white women were raped by black men, whilst in the same period, less than 10 black women were raped by white men.
Be happy and safe. Nat
With all these goals I’m setting and striving for, my ultimate goal is to be a better person today than I was yesterday. To be a better Christian, a better mom, a better homemaker, a better employee, a better me. I want to be the best I can be, always. I always thought I was like this already, but come to find out, I’m not. I’ve always worked hard and I always thought that I was done with something when I became bored with it, whether it was my job, apartment, my looks. So I usually just changed it. Moved, got a new job, dyed my hair, until I got bored again, and then the cycle would repeat itself. The problem was, I was never getting ahead, never becoming the BEST me I could be. I was always starting over. The change was satisfying for me, temporarily, until I got bored again, and unhappy.
Rob had a big bag that he carried with him at all times, almost like a woman’s purse, but this was a boating bag with lots of little pockets for all sorts of goodies he liked to have at his disposal. I’ve noted that I went through his bag October 2nd for things that the friend on the boat next door to ours had wanted. He had helped in unloading the boat of personal effects and it was his g/f who had found Rob, and they’d now decided I wasn’t their friend anymore as I wasn’t as welcoming as they were.
Don't you wish you knew all the ins and outs about such things you've never seen before? For one thing, we both had to ask about the holes in the first place. Supposedly they are escape hatches for the bats! Are you kidding me! There are that many bats living inside the walls of these apartments???
Or later, when I cannot sleep,
While Ambiga doubts that the government and police will be “stupid enough” to risk negative publicity again, her colleague Andrew Khoo says that nothing can be discounted.
Good Morning crafters, hope everyone is well. I had a great birthday yesterday and received some stunning cards which I will share with you when I post the result of my candy. I did spend some of my day crafting and here is the result. Dustin Pike a fantastic artist has finally started a challenge blog - Doodle Dragon Studios Challenge Blog and the first challenge was to use a freebie image with a Valentine theme.
Now I’m a big fan of ‘but what was it like for ordinary people?’ question, I probably don’t ask it enough but I think it is important, especially in medieval history. When almost all the written sources come from the upper classes or the clergy and the sheer force of personality of the rulers can so easily overpower everything else, it is important to remember that the vast majority of people’s voices aren’t being recorded to reach a modern audience. Mortimer doesn’t quite redress that balance – I don’t think anyone can with the sources available – but he does paint an interesting picture of everyday life based on facts, statistics, and anecdotes gathered from a lot of research, from which it takes only a little imagination to start thinking of the people from all classes who inhabited medieval England as complex people rather than medieval fantasy stereotypes.
Getting parents involved, education, study harder — (laughter) — greater responsibility, mortgages.
7) All of the prophets “SINCE the world began” spoke of the restitution of all things (the millennium or the coming kingdom age). Acts 3:21, and Acts 3:24. When that time arrives the twelve apostles will be sitting on twelve thrones judging the twelve tribes of Israel. Matthew 19:28. Note the words of the LORD Jesus Christ in Mark 1:14-15 and Matthew 4:17, why the Kingdom of Heaven was at hand.
Her early career found her working as a backup singer and model. She sang backup for acts such as Chaka Khan, Lou Rawls, and Jermaine Jackson.
Next the mahatma came and placed his fingers in our ears. When he did, I immediately began to hear flutes and the sound of rushing water. This really startled me because it was playing in my head. I opened my eyes and the mahatma laughed at me and told me to close my eyes again. Then he took my hands and placed my own fingers in my ears. The music continued for some time and then it slowly faded away.
“Since she was little, Mya’s been helping me stuff goodie bags and hand out raffle baskets for various fundraisers to support the Foundation,” said Dawn. “When Mya found out about the t-shirt design contest, she was eager to participate, and this contest was a new way for her to get involved.”
I don't know if I'd call her vocabulary approximations or not. I have to translate most of what she says, but sounds are getting clearer. Like "bed-dy" for ready was "belly" until very recently. She'll be having tubes put in and her tonsils (and maybe adenoids) removed soon, so it will be interesting to see how all of that plays into her language/speech. We still use lots of sign language, and she constantly has me asking her teacher what this or that new sign she's using is.
And they’re a step back toward “We the People”, and away from “I the president.
On December 17th, 2011, I found out my bone marrow was 100% donor and the stem-cell transplant was successful. I was numbed by shock but somewhere deep down, it was euphoric and I was ecstatic.
The Prophecy is the kind of novel that truly satisfies that desire to explore new worlds. It's thought-provoking and it's unique. I enjoyed it whole-heartedly, and will be looking forward to visiting Gill James' vision of the future again in the second Peace Child novel. Those who enjoy stories set in the future should definitely consider giving this out-of-the-ordinary tale a look.
I disregarded these tasteless remarks and got to the issue at hand. “Tonight is Christmas Eve, Pricklewood,” I said. “Would you care to share your plans for tomorrow with me?”
The glands are related to the purpose of renovation of cells, degeneration and also their rejuvenation. They allow not only the production of the potential physical energy needed by the body for its metabolic functions, but also cooperate in the production of energy to be directed to the mental and the spiritual bodies. Cayce believed that the endocrine system was a pathway to reach and understand God.
It was a rush to get the kids ready and to the bus stop on time at 7:22!
One of the changes that I am going to be making has to do with my "kids" that I volunteer with at an inner city school. Late in November 10 were moved to another class and that teacher does not have the time to let me share scrapbooking with his class. Its cool those kids will have new and fun experiences...........but in December when I went to wish them a Merry Xmas I was literally knocked off my feet with their hugs, and tears begging me to let them scrap. To get their teacher to continue it. I left the class room heartbroken because at the time I could not think of a way for them to take part and continue the creative journalling, or the scrapbooking.
Iván Meade – How have you influenced your community with your designs?
I recognise and honour every aspect of myself (woman, creatrix, writer, mother, soul...)
I’m content because its nothing strange.
On top of all of this- they do not charge for their services and do not receive any government grants.
Out of touch with reality
With the situation on Altair deteriorating rapidly and Kagura nowhere to be found and proven unreliable, Izumo mans the Ahura Gnis and travels to Vega himself to find a Rare Igura who could be the True Eve. Zessica, who is feeling weak and unsure of what to do next, resigns herself to only being with Amata when in union, but Izumo proved powerful, breaking past the defenses and demanding Chairman Crea hand over an Igura. Zessica volunteers, but while trying to stop her Mix gets in the way and her Vector is captured and taken back to Altair.
A complete explanation of why Mercedes use this system is in my first article on the subject.
Victoria's grave stone came in last week, and I went with my brother to see it after it was placed. There's something about seeing the stone that just makes it seem more...I don't know, "real", I guess. Seeing the dates of her birth and death carved in granite has a certain finality to it that I can't really describe. August 23, 2003 - November 10, 2011. Eight years is such a short time.
Mr Colton denies all these allegations.
For the conscience to function in a godly way it must be influenced by godly convictions. To gain godly convictions, our consciousness of what is right and what is wrong must be sharpened. This involves the mind. It is a matter of doctrine.
Fair warning: this is long and talky. If you get to the end of this, you have my admiration. If you just want the nutshell version, here it is:
available exclusively at salon 828! 302.622.8288
Though I never served booze as a minor nor was a drinker myself, I got being able to predict the kind of drinks people would order just by looking at 'em when they walked in. The men in jeans with bronze belt buckles would usually order whatever was on tap or a bottle of bud. The ones in business suits would loosen their ties and order "whiskey straight". Women rarely came into the bar area, but when they did, they usually ordered vodka or gin martinis. The just 21 girls usually wanted a mudslide or a naughty root beer or screwdriver, because they weren't used to the taste yet. Either that or a Sex-On-The-Beach just so they could snicker when they said the name. In the restaurant Champagne and red and white wine were served with the seafood menu.
All the attorneys, all the financiers, all the helicopter parents worried about their children and trying to stay in control of the situation–that’s what these things are, aren’t they? The illusion of control? All these systems knocked out. You’re not going to finish the big deal, you’re not going to file those papers on time, you don’t know exactly where your 17 year old son or daughter is, and you can’t tell any of those people what to do. You can’t stay abreast of things.
I have been asked a lot recently if paper type really matters and instead of explaining how you can get hugely different results, I made up these samples (coloured exactly the same) which now live in my sample book......
I can’t really finish this review without also commenting on the relationship/friendship between Wayne and Wally. Wally is Wayne’s only real friend, and the two strike up a friendship that lasts what could be a lifetime. Wally is the only person Wayne can truly be himself around, and she never questions him. As much as I liked the character of Wally, I did feel that Winter spent far too much time focusing on her, when their relationship, although inevitably a special one, doesn’t really lead anywhere. The most interesting relationship of the whole novel has to be between Wayne and his father, and for me, these were the pivotal moments where Winter came into her own as a writer. The fact that Treadway goes from being a very masculine man, to becoming ultimately very accepting of who Wayne is, and of who he will be, is truly special to watch. I only wished it could have been explored more than it was.
And bring the glorious soul of France
Haha, I love it!
Holly Cupala has officially established herself as being an incredible writer of tough subjects, first with Tell Me a Secret and now with Don't Breathe a Word. She writes with such vivid prose, throwing the reader straight into tough situations and holds absolutely nothing back. She writes with such raw honesty that even the most close-minded readers will find their thoughts challenged, if not changed completely.
*Is it a neccessary item?
Runner Up: Thornbridge Raven (again.....)
Paper: Early Espresso, Baja Breeze, Whisper White, DSP
Getting older usually means getting wiser, and a little darker.
Trying to make ends meet,
If these valid, rational and present truths are what you have subscribed to, why bother going after your dream, working harder than you ever have for anything in your life or putting in the effort, the patience and the time? Apparently, you are right, since you have already convinced yourself that you are. All the excuses have become all that you are.
(Teaching creative writing courses/acting as RLF Fellow etc)
Newt Gingrich won:
Kevin went back to work, and no one ever knew what had really happened. He kept it all under wraps. However, weeks later, Sheila went to Kevin in tears. “What’s wrong?” Kevin asked with the fear that she had found out about his affairs. “I have to tell you something, and I don’t know how.” Sheila said with anguish in her voice. “It’s ok Sheila, just tell me” Kevin said. She went on to say that she and Bobby had been having an affair for months. And that she had no other choice than to leave Kevin because she didn’t love him anymore. She wanted to be with Bobby. “What the Hell are you talking about? How could you do this? Bobby is married to Tammy. He doesn’t want you!” Kevin screamed as he punched a hole in the drywall. Sheila dropped her head as she began to explain, “Tammy and I have been friends for years Kevin, and I know you never paid enough attention to me to know that. We have discussed it, and Tammy and I both want to be with Bobby. And together we have decided it’s ok for us both to love him. Both of us are going to be his wives.” Kevin was floored as he came to the conclusion that Bobby’s secret was more than just a secret. It was justice served, southern style, off the Creek.
I purchased a copy of A Visit From the Goon Squad after the reading, and the student used one of those handheld credit card machines, sliding the imprinter over the carbon slip again and again. The numbers grew illegible, but I didn't argue. The next day, a woman called to ask me for my credit card number, and I was tempted to ask whether she was really an employee of Dickinson College, or someone who collected credit card numbers for her own gain. But as I'd left my phone number with the girl, I gave her the number again. I'll be watching my account statements, though. :)
the event winner. I can’t comment on any dual at the front of the fleet as
Is it social to disengage from a conversation at lunch long enough to check in and earn 6 points on foursquare?
“I got stripes/stripes around my shoulders/ I got chains/ Chains around my feet.” Johnny Cash is one of my favorite musical artists, and I’d like to dedicate this post to him. Of course, my stripes aren’t like the ones he references, but I can’t help but think of that song whenever I wear them.
Feel isolated
And so it came to pass Mrs Nikos and me arrived in New York during a heatwave to search out Rizzoli's bookshop where Manos spotted an art book with a painting of the Mona Lisa on its cover.
Instead, Bob died and I went on antidepressants. Was that my choice or part of the master game plan? I did not belong to a faith community. I went to see a rabbi (Bob was Jewish) and I went to see my parent’s pastor. They both basically blew me off. I went to see a doctor and he gave me antidepressants and told me to keep coming back. I have long believed that this was one of the two biggest mistakes of my life. The cure for death is developing a mature spirituality. I didn’t do it. I made a choice, and my choice was to turn my back on the one true God and put my faith in a lot of little demi-gods and their bottles of pills.
If I did, I'll never know.
Friday (I know it's not weekend, but still part of the craziness): Charlie had a soccer class make-up, I brain-farted and forgot about it on Tuesday. Charlie had school, we had Ben's friend Sam here, the pm kindergartner's were off school, they had a blast and I was able to get a little work done. Can't remember the rest of the day
"We will never let them get away with making these laws even more 'flexible' to allow even higher levels of exploitation," COSATU said in a statement.
In addition to the vapor-bound river, the countryside lay punctuated with farmers’ ponds, exposed via banks of fog steaming overhead. Normally hidden by tall fields of grass or corn, the wisps of moisture called attention to the quiet shallows, home to frogs and watering holes for livestock.
Tell you that our destiny was written long ago in the stars
Mothers Day is a day that means something to everyone
Of course after this brief photo session it was back to work as usual.
Dear Mrs. Sackson, I was thinking about Paul. He was the best cid in the world. I am vary happy I got to be His Friend. And I Loved Him so much. Love, Belle.
With reference to my photo in the layout, I did not realize when I was actually snapped by the camera but when I pray, I really focus and I pray for the best of everything. I believe in God and I believe in prayer - a lot. And I believe that we are not supposed to pray only when we are in trouble - people say don't pray when it rains if you do not pray when the sun shines. I believe God always hear and answer our prayers, even if the answer is sometimes no :)
World leaders witness and beware
I colored the perfume bottle and background image with Copics. The bottle was cut out and popped up with a dimensional foam circle. The center image was stamped a second time and embossed in silver. I added a bit of stitching, twill, and a pretty lil' flower.
8. Painting the living room and hallway in November to give it the same much needed makeover that the kitchen received.
But I have one more warning for all of the guys.
Well the time has come, we absolutely love our new home and pictures of my daughter’s room are soon on the way.
JUICE will look at Jupiter, its atmosphere, its magnetosphere, but its key science goal is to study the moons – Ganymede, Callisto and Europa in particular. There are plenty of unanswered questions about the moons – questions thrown up from earlier missions such as Galileo. We know these moons are icy, but how icy? Is there liquid water on these moons, and in what quantity? The thickness of the crust of ice on Europa’s surface is currently a guess based on some incomplete data and extrapolated from models. If we ever wanted to send a probe to the Europan surface, it would be good to know if we were landing on thin ice.
Sisters?
Now, I'll admit that the first line to The Dead-Tossed Waves changed several times as I kept changing who the protagonist was and where/when it was set but the line that made it into the book is still the same line that started out that particular draft (and in the interesting tidbit category, I also came up with that first line while on the road and emailed it to myself -- seems to be a trend.)
Located 250 km southeast of Havana, the city was founded by French settlers in 1819, and its historic centre was declared a World Cultural Heritage site in 2005 by the United Nations Educational, Scientific and Cultural Organisation (UNESCO).
Life will always be a struggle, and we will always have obstacles in life. I try to stay calm, and enjoy today! When things are meant to be, they will be. Sounds like a cliché but truly let life take its course! Having skin cancer, I will say has not defined who I am but has allowed me to see things in a brighter light! A little scare like that, has to have some positiveness come out of it right? Which by the way things are good right now!
Well my big 5 year old is on to day 3 of school today and wow it has been busy! My fantasy of life getting a bit easier with one at school has been completely turned on its head... getting two, sometimes three kids out the door before the 9am drop off and back at 3 has been a real challenge for me so far! Jack's afternoon sleeps have had to completely change and I actually think I am going to have less time not more because of that! School is going great though and she is very happy so that's good and I'm sure once I get used to it all things will settle down a bit (I hope!)
Starting on a low heat setting, I ironed my stencil onto the lampshade. The reason the freezer paper sticks, is because the heat from the iron melts the wax on the paper. It’s not going to completely adhere, but just enough so it won’t move around while painting.
- Bill Murray and gopher puppets are all that is needed for an 11-year-old boy to laugh and enjoy an adult comedy
Sunshine’s central problem is the characters – though played better than could be expected by an ensemble of very good actors, the writing is terribly flat. Not a single member of this family is a character so much as a compendium of tics and unusual traits. They’re not caricatures – they’re too oddball to be caricatures – but the effect amounts to the same thing, making any emotional connection difficult, if not impossible. For a film that attempts to suture a family in crisis, this lack of feeling is an impossible hurdle to jump. Combine this with generally muddled writing and an ending that feels premature, and it’s difficult to get anything of note out of Sunshine. However, it’s certainly not hard to enjoy on a surface level – when the actors are allowed some room, such as in the hilarious exchange on sarcasm between Steve Carell and Greg Kinnear, the movie comes to life. The same is true of some of the setpieces, particularly the running gags about the family’s broken-down Volkswagon bus. Unfortunately, these moments aren't enough to fill the emptiness at the center of the film.
thanks for reading, world.
I don't have much to say this week... really this year. Have you noticed the lame posts? And I don't have much to say, but bear with me while I tell you what's on my mind.
8. Kamichu!
Total cuman ada 6 film di postingan preview kali ini, there’s The Avenger, Men In Black III, Dark Shadows, Moonrise Kingdom, The Dictator, and What To Expect When You’re Expecting.
23rd Feb 2012 Thursday Spitalfields Market
located in the Konark, Odisha (formerly Orrissa). It is also a World Heritage Site. The complex is designed in the form of a huge chariot drawn by seven spirited horses on twelve pairs of wheels of ‘SUN’. (Remember 12 months in calander!) Built in AD 1250, during the reign of the Eastern Ganga King Narasimhadeva-I (AD1238-64), the Konark Temple is a place of abode for Lord Jagannatha.
A Few Concerns
Right. Because most people don't equate self-publishing with actually being published. Agent Rachel Gardner said it best on her blog in a November, 2009 post:
We flew from Jeddah to Jizan, on the southwest coast of KSA. From there we took the ferry to Farasan Island, the largest of the more than 200 Farasan islands in the group. We then took a tour of the island, stopping at various scenic and historic sites. One of them was a heritage village, where we were greeted with traditional drumming and dancing and escorted through the village's restored homes, reminiscent of life hundreds of years ago. The homes, built of natural materials, kept the occupants cool during the hot days and warm on cool ones.
UPDATE 11/29/11: This giveaway is now closed. Congratulations Darrell!
1 identify
And then- suddenly- it all started to change. The evening moved out of our consciousness- of our own fears and expectations and took on a life of its own. Pam arrived- with still 9 minutes to spare.
To survive we all need to try new things and develop new ways of reaching our audiences. But it needs to be measurable. If the ideas work they are rolled in to the 80% if not we learn and move on. Rather than try and sell those in on an adhoc basis, fighting for budgets in the weeds, we need to all buy into this at a high level.
for the world.
a member of the
It surprises me how many people I’ve met who haven’t heard of it, so I make it my duty to enlighten them…. and now, you! The secret to an iron free life is to unload the dryer immediately, fold the clothes or hang. Then on the day you pull out your favorite ensemble, simply spray any remaining wrinkles, and smooth out with your hand.
That means the tax penalty of making things in America is very high. Since it is often a close call whether to expand or build in America, this difference often is the deciding factor (when the sum of other factors, like transportation, skills, etc. are close).
Still, the taste of an ooey, gooey, slightly burnt marshmallow and it’s attendant graham cracker and chocolate bar make up for a lot. Perhaps not Kevin Costner’s movie, but close. And the feeling of exhilaration from a bike ride literally over the river and through the woods was worth something. It won’t build the enamel back that I ground from my teeth whilst watching the movie, alas. I must be crazy for watching it to the end.
It’s surprising how some people react when you tell them God healed you. Some are happy for you, others say, “Prove it,” others are offended. “I’ve been praying for years and God never healed me, why do you deserve it when I don’t?” Some will say, “You’ve changed. Change back.” Who knew? Well God did, so he warns you. And he says you’re in good company, so rejoice. Spending time getting to know God, learning to hearing him speak in many different ways, and having a restored relationship with him is ever so much more fun than depression, anxiety and living a lie. God is good. Very, very good.
The discussion topic was the sociopath’s girlfriend, who he claims is not his girlfriend, but merely a coworker, who he lives with, and takes everywhere he goes, including family functions, like Thanksgiving, Christmas, and birthday celebrations. I have known he had someone for about two years now, and I could not care less. What bothers me, and my 7 year old son, is that he lies about it when it’s so obvious. Seriously, we are divorced, and anything or anyone that takes his sights off me me if fully approved by me. I’d like to warn her, but I know just about how far that would go, so…
On the subject - Greenwich based Meantime have a strong range of beers and a strong reputation. This brew is their way of gently reminding the beer loving community that even lager can be finely crafted.
The doctor, Ed says, claimed he didn’t know anything about Nadya’s family situation. “After that, I thought, ‘That’s it. Over.’”
4/1/12 - Final component implemented for customers in areas 1 and 2, except Consumer-Directed Care Plus (CDC+) participants. Read moreâ€¦
Solar storms can also make global positioning systems less accurate and cause GPS outages.
“Plan sponsors need to focus on communicating the risks and realities facing (DB) plans to bridge the knowledge gaps. At the same time, it may be incumbent on members themselves to become more informed—to understand how this component of their financial futures works and, more importantly, what it will mean to them when they retire.”
"I massage Ramesh in breaks to keep him calm - and often give him a happy ending"
* you can answer anonymously if you prefer (nb if you give your name it is not released publicly and we do not share data with others)
The East put out a single flag,
She is priceless.
In order to realize this mission the Michigan Immigrant Rights Center:
And then, as I was at the point of breaking, something incredible happened.
In 1985, I was in the Soviet Union – firstly Russia and then what was, at that time, called Soviet Central Asia. On the trip, I kept encountering a group of holidaying Finns. This is the shortened version of my diary entries about what happened…
Deglaze the pan with sherry, scraping up any bits on bottom of pan, and reduce until evaporated. Stir in cider and broth; bring to a boil. Reduce heat to medium-low. Add pork with residual juices and 1 Tbsp. thyme. Simmer stew until thickened, 5 minutes; season with salt and pepper.
Posting a photo a day definitely can lead to some content monotony I’m afraid. Or at least I’ve felt like that over the last couple of weeks. Maybe it’s because I’ve been a bit preoccupied with preparation of my baby’s arrival and haven’t had as much time to get out and about, deep into the bush like usual. Timing is ironic sometimes. This is actually the time of year when snakes start becoming more scarce.
“To speculate about such a situation is ridiculous to begin with, and to suggest I would have done anything differently than the passengers on that plane was irresponsible. I deeply apologize to the families of the victims that my answer came off as insensitive, it was certainly not my intention.”
"Ketchup? No, we're out of ketchup"
Nearly 6 years ago, when the term CFS started to be mentioned by the doctor I was seeing, my good blogging friend Carole said, in her opinion my problem was TMB – too much brain. I was constantly thinking of anything and everything, pulling it apart and reassembling it in a multitude of ways. She expressed surprise that I couldn’t see I was probably exhausting myself with that amount of cranial activity.
I love the days when I feel good at this parenting thing!
The Suprêmes de Volaille aux Champignons took all I had. There was the trip to the grocery store. Easy enough. But then I had to go to the wine store and ask for Medeira, which according to Julia was to be of a medium-dry type. Now all that's fine and good until you have to ask for it in French. But off I went to the wine store. I smiled, spouted my rehearsed line and the guy handed me a dry white saying in perfect English, "You don't want the Medeira. This is better."
When the ex and I split, he included a bookmark that his son had made me for valentine's day in the box with my things. Now, not being a cruel person, I decided I had to acknowledge it. So I sent him a thank you note telling him how much I loved it. He drew pictures of the dogs on it. Very cute. I figured that it was up to the ex to decide to give it to him or not. What I didn't expect is that his son would call me from the grandmother's phone. Sigh...I thanked him again, but apparently the ex figured it was a good idea to not tell the kid that we're not dating anymore. Yeah, really great. So when the kid asked when he would see me, I told him he really had to just talk to his father about that. I felt like a shit.
He is SUPER funny and says hilarious things!!
48 only
“No you did not.” Mr Marshall interrupted him. “You have not been meaning anything. Not until today, at any rate.” There was a soft huff and a quiet rustle, as if a fat feather duster was brushing over the undergrowth. “You want to know the secret of this town; why nobody speaks, why I own everything and why you couldn’t remember who you were or why you came here until today when those pesky sons of Hades prompted you to remember.”
Le Bazar Saint Remois
How exciting! I've been nominated in the Best MAD Family Fun Blog and in the Best MAD Family Life Blog which is really lovely of someone to think of us when they were filling in their nominations.
The I-T Department, in a number of cases, has uncovered several individuals possessing multiple PAN cards or forging the details to evade taxes and create ‘benami’ properties.
on days he'd nap, bedtime was becoming a struggle and a half and he wasn't eyes-closed-asleep until at least 9 o'clock – too late! – often with me asleep right next to him at that point.
Think about it, people. You were given a brain not to sit and be brainwashed by watching television and sitting back quietly. You should not just exist and hope the world will be alright. You should actively go out into the world and be heard. Do not deny the truth any longer.
For one, it is gruesome without creating a sense of sympathy. In the first few minutes, the journalist is brutally tortured to death by slow electrocution. It is difficult to watch and the only act of violence done in earnest. Later, you are either beaten over the idea with further torture when Holland watches video interviews of survivors describig torture they suffered or cheap special effects like when Holland throws a henchman off a balcony with a fire hose wrapped around his throat. It is hilarious obvious it is a dummy hanging limp. Even the Doctor’s inevitable death at the hands of a mob of villagers is fake and anticlimactic. You do not get sense of justice out of it.
I'm off to my messy room to create more tags! Have a great week!
However, this Welsh cog railway illustrates the positive side of cogs.
DEALER: Calibrate this, asshole.A lot has changed since I started this blog 5 years ago. But one thing will never change: Marketers' brainless, pathetic pursuit of young people.
If you are stuck in your writing, or you want to try a different approach, or you are just getting bored with a character or story, try something to change your perspective. It can be a real thing, like moving your couch and sitting in a new place to think. It can be a variation to your writing routine, like moving outside or switching sides of the cafe booth where you always sit. It can even be an exercise, like writing the same scene from the eyes of a different character or changing from third person to first person.
Tim Curry is nearly unrecognizable as the subject of so many children’s nightmares, including mine. He’s a shapeshifter, adapted from the shapeshifting creature from King’s delirious novel, but mostly he’s a clown in a white jumpsuit and razor fangs that bleed. His eyes may be the scariest part – when he’s at his peak of fury, they glow a deathly blue, weirdly magnetic, which makes them all the more terrifying. He stalks a group of small-town kids, and then, even worse, continues stalking as they become adults. BEST MOMENT: Stretching his arm out of a photo album…
Many is the time she has told me a story about someone and I've said, vulture-like, "Can I have that or are you going to use it?" The answer is usually no but that's fine.
For many people, anger is expressed when they feel out of control. What I find with a lot of adoptees, though, is that they use anger to feel in control. This is why the child may react with anger or rage after a period of calm or when he has shared intimacy with a parent. This may trigger feelings of vulnerability in him, which he defends against by getting mad and physically or psychologically pushing you away. The anger is used to help him feel safe. When parents respond with anger, it confirms to the child that people can’t be trusted and that the world is a threatening place.
What I have never understood is why it takes 5 times as many people to make the arrangements…
There are lots of ways to tie a scarf. Depends on the outfit and the scarf. But here are some inspirations if you're a scarf newbie like me. Or maybe just need some new looks.
So, there you have it, folks! I’m in a bit of a rush at the moment, (long story,) but I do wish you all a beautiful rest of the week and a beautiful life!
2. Black Velvet Jacket
After my illness, I got drunk so infrequently and my hangovers were so horrific that I probably remember every occasion. On one of them, I drove my father for a visit with my sister and her cotton-ginner husband near Tallulah, Louisiana, some hundred miles distant. We three men took a one-night camping trip upon which we mostly drank. When the two of them went back to drinking the next morning, I told my father that I either needed to sober up, or we needed to plan on spending the night at my sister’s. He said we could stay, but when nighttime came, he wanted to go home. I reminded him of his agreement, and he said that, by god, if I wasn’t man enough to drive, he was. When I objected, he set out walking—or at least it looked a little like walking. While my sister and brother-in-law went to fetch him, I prepared as best I could for our drive across the battlefields of the Old South.
Here is a close up of the Owl button in a small cluster with some leaves, resin flowers and also a piece of green doily also from Purple Pumpkin.
or how I yielded to soft fingertips.
It’s important to always keep the simplest of reminders at the forefront of my consciousness and so it is a good way to begin this blog site.
In my eyes the 80′z Roc Event was a total success and ke sure bigger n better events are yet to come from them.
rhetoric could justify
after trying everything I could think of... and none of it helping...
According to the Bible all the armies that defeated Israel were used of God to punish Israel not because he favored those nations by providing them weapons of mass destruction to defeat Israel.
I chose to do a video format because it makes sense and falls in line with the feeling of excitement I want to convey to the audience. If I simply used photos or wrote about the fights it wouldn’t have nearly the same impact as seeing the punches thrown with your own eyes. The music I added I feel adds to the drama being shown on the screen.
“I had no idea what I was getting involved in,” said Jake, “I didn’t realize how much fun I was going to have as a volunteer, along with the amount of fun the athletes had. The event was so competitive, yet there was the perfect balance of the athletes’ competitive spirit and their respect for their peers.”
out of this because I’ve never considered myself a “romance” writer. To me, romance writers focus on that HEA (Happily Ever After) ending; and if you’ve followed me for any length of time (or read any of my published short stories), you know that circumstance is pretty much an unplanned accident in my normal writings.
And read. Lots.
8 Up Hard
Things like drinking my coffee while he eats his oatmeal for breakfast.
About how much we love her and how much she loves us.
Well, I'm sure I don't understand what's going on, honey. We tried to wire the money to you, $4500, but the agent said he needed a passport verification number and something called a FPCC number first. I don't know what this is, your uncle was at the Western Union, but got real real sick and had to go to the hospital again. I think he's just so afraid that you're stuck over there it was too much for his heart. He's not doing so well now. I'm praying to God that he doesn't die before you get home to say goodbye. If you were to miss seeing your Uncle Marvin and Great Grandma Clareece because you got stuck over there, well I just don't know.
I used large cookie cutters - both gingerbread man and Christmas shapes were used. These were nice in that they didn't poof up and lose their shape...no eggs and minimal leavening I suspect...and my whole house smelled AWESOME as these baked! I thought a tablespoon of ginger and cinnamon and 1/2 teaspoon of cloves was almost too much...but it was absolutely perfect. I'm completely happy. Thanks Michelle for the info and the inspiration!
I work from 6 to 9:30 tonight, so that doesn’t exactly help me. But I’m hoping that I can hurry up and cobble these essays together. I know I will make the 6-page minimum, because I already have 3 pages just from the first essay. And I have to write four more. Or just BS them because I’m so tired of school I don’t want to spend any more time on it. I know I’m not going to get an A on it anyway, because I haven’t gotten anything better than a B in Dr. Harding’s class. I still have about an hour before I have to be to work, so maybe I can at least get halfway done.
Keegan DeWitt (singer-songwriter, film composer)
They separate, and punches are thrown. Cresswell lands a big right hand, then goes for the take down.
Some departures are well-planned, long-anticipated and feel like we’re moving toward or through something, maybe the next chapter of our lives. Others are like flights in the night, more like acts of desperation, and may feel like we’re simply running away from something. Hopefully our departures are more like the former than the latter. Hopefully our departures allow us to step forth into a new opportunity with the blessings of those who have helped to nurture us in the previous chapter of our lives. Hopefully we can leave the nest with a sense of both a blessing to experience new freedom and experiences as well as a sense of our roots and the blessings that flow from that.
This is pro sports, your logo needs to be deceptively simple, not actually simple. The more you stare at most team logos, the more you discover. Little lines, small colors, maybe some hidden elements. The longer I stare at this the longer I feel like I got a free Valium subscription. He did say he liked "the alternate 'circle' version" and even devised his own alternate "adding a ring and a better, sporty font" to the main logo (right).
The Sonoma Bookcase from Ballard Designs is a dead ringer for the one I have. They have good sales, so if you're patient, the price could get better.
Oxfordshire Black Porter - x.x% - Porter
Happy Friday! It's sunshiney in Portland today and I plan on getting outside and doing one of my favorite activities: wandering around my neighborhood, window shopping, & people watching. I was so excited about this morning's beautiful weather that I went for a 7 mile run right when I woke up. Then I made this juice:
CD: Not a snail lover then. How about slugs?
Noise
I never watch The Big Bang Theory because my son forbids it. He tells me that it's an ethnic slur against his kind. Marianne and I are expected to watch Community instead. (A friend who works for Community College of Philadelphia tells me that the latter is an ethnic slur against his kind, but that's another story.)
So what is the back up plan now that WW III has been cancelled? I think 2013 will be the year in which the TSA and the local police are sent out to die. This requires a bit of explaining.
It was an interesting exercise for me because I found it very difficult to actually commit myself on paper (in electrons, anyway). I wrote up to it. I wrote around it. I laid out paragraph after paragraph of preparation. I finally had to actually force myself to write something specifically about unschooling per se.
This is true. However there’s no reason why it should stop at abortion. Through actions we should potentiate the increasing pool of individuals to result in a larger pool of great people. Let’s eliminate periods altogether by keeping women perpetually pregnant. A single woman, with pregnancies lasting about nine months each, ignoring the possibility of twins, could roughly produce 45 children within her lifetime! A single mother and her progeny could make 2040 children, vastly increasing the possibility of one of them being the next beethoven. If we to enforce this upon the current population, a single generation would be responsible for 13 500 000 000 births, in all certainty rippling with great people probably setting their minds to fix some rather alarming emerging problems.
Thank you for being in my life!
Mike and Jenny: Farmer Founded RK Capital Management. Donations: £3m. Conservative Party co-treasurer.
There are stories and interviews and inteative events in all the media all across Canada all day – for a fuller list of media events to look out for check out this bulletin Canadian Newswire…
In the same way, Bush created the Guantanamo Bay (“Gitmo”) detention facility. Bush expanded the rendition program that had been used by Bill Clinton. Bush created the Patriot Act. Bush approved of domestic surveillance. Bush set up the military tribunals that had been used by Democrats like FDR in previous time of war. Bush established the indefinite detentions of the most hardened terrorists.
So much has happened since I last wrote here in May, there'd be no way I could recap all that took place, and it's almost too much to even summarize the highlights. But in a nutshell: God is good. Even when life is hard, God is good. That's the one constant, always, no matter what. God is good....
When we were finished for the day he told me "your snatch is looking better."
rainbow curves
To the fan of Moby Dick, this piece not only recalls, but extends The Nut, the chapter where Ishmael makes an argument for the intelligence of the Sperm Whale. Quoting German Phrenological legend, Ishmael argues the spinal cord of the whale as nothing less than a series of partially developed skulls. Thus the tiny brain of the whale could be seen as extending the immense length of its carriage.
Two things primarily concern me about this; firstly the way that their cases are becoming a cause celebre for the radical left and even Islamists here in Britain (if you click on the links for the groups which organised this tour, that should speak for itself).
Consumer Confidence
Last year I reviewed “New Deal or Raw Deal?” by Burton Folsom, Jr. It was and, in my view, still is the best book I have read on this period in the nation’s history that spanned the Great Depression years of the 1930s. Michael Hiltzick, a Pulitzer Prize-winning journalist has written The New Deal: A Modern History ($30.00, Free Press) of the same period 80 years ago and come to some very different conclusions. Indeed, his take on that period and especially on Franklin D. Roosevelt are quite different from Folsom’s. In many ways it is an apologia for FDR, a rewrite of the many other books that examined this period that generally assert that FDR’s administrations actually extended and worsened the Depression with its hodge-podge of programs and its taxation policies. Astonishingly, Hiltzick asserts that FDR was in fact a conservative as were his remedies. Hiltzick has labored hard and produced a large book that is the reverse mirror image of the way most others perceived the Depression.
Case in point: When I read the online dating profile of a potential suitor, I always check to make sure he wants kids in the future. If he says he doesn’t want children, that’s a huge red flag and, frankly, an immediate no. I refuse to spend my time trying (perhaps in vain) to convince someone to have kids. To that same question, he might also answer maybe, which elicits the same reaction from me — see ya! If he’s “not sure” he wants kids, I don’t want to date him. Why pour myself into a relationship that I know will not lead where I want it to lead?
so that he can love you
2. Impressions
Things start of slow in the P.I. department until Kate and Andrea get their first case. Danger is around every corner solving that one.
Overall, Austin has really embraced us and we're kinda enthralled. Infact so much so that we've been contemplating if a move might be possible for us. Let's just see what happens.
To shoot the toy I set it up against a simple background made from yellow construction paper. I blocked off some of the light from hitting the wall so it would fade out in the bottom of the frame. This was even shot with my trusty film camera, a real challenge for product photography when you can’t see your results.
Far and wide Oh Canada we stand on guard for thee
It's a stifling tendency. Whether it's in the context of an outfit or a space, there needs to be room to breathe. When we made the move to Pittsburgh, we only had three weeks notice of our departure, which lead to us moving with more stuff than we needed to. There was no time to clean out, throw out, or sort, all this baggage came with us from our past life and every weekend I sort, throw away, and donate more unwanted, and unnecessary stuff. It's not just our apartment, it's my closet as well. As I unpacked my summer stuff from storage, I noticed hemlines and silhouettes that were no longer of interest to me. After the initial purging of stuff, I felt as if I was finished, like I had gotten rid of what I had to. But as I scanned my closet yesterday, looking for this dress, I saw lurkers. I'm clearly not finished yet.
I have to mention, I like the wording of 'delaying' sexual activity as opposed to abstinence. As well, I think grade seven/eight is a good time to start bringing up gender identity. The source quoted in the Star seemed to give the impression that 6 and 7 year olds would be made to question their identity. Meanwhile, grade 7 and 8 I have found is the age where kids start using words like 'queer' and 'fag' and 'slut' and 'bitch' to hurt each other... thus the perfect age to start looking at the connotations behind such terms.
Once sliced, they also transport well in lunch boxes. They also taste great with a fresh cup of coffee or tea.
Filipino Beach Fest!!!
The distress signal was received from a certain planet, and you were facing the planet.
It's no secret that I absolutely love limes. I'll substitute lime juice for lemon nine times out of ten - I even put it in my water - and if there's ever a lime garnish going spare, you can be sure I'm going to ask for it (politely, of course). So it may come as a surprise that this is my first ever Key Lime Pie.
Sounds like a punishment to me. Imagine..glued in one spot forever staring at some dude...yikes...I mean I know Apollo is hot(he's the sun God...that was a pun) but seriously...couldn't a cute little water nymph bag her some Aries or some Dionysus(the God of PARTIES!!!) or perhaps Poseidon...God of the Sea..they have water in common after all. Poor nymph. And her name was Clytie..yeah...sound a lot like...anyway...she needs to be free...just sayin'
your gaze wanders
Bills (WTF!? Where have I been? How could I have acquired a damn BILL!? And WHY does Loudoun County think I'm going to pay said bill?? Fools!)
RELEASE DATE: May 4, 2012
God and I needed a serious talk. And in that conversation He carefully reminded me of this:
The path is not clear yet but I know it holds great meaning, this I have great faith in. I have lived 40 years basing my decisions on what I though others wanted me to do or what society demanded of me. What I never took time for was me… What I didn’t realize was the beautiful divine feminine spark that was being smothered. A fire of creativity, joy and laughter was being taken away and I was the one allowing this to happen. I was a flower waiting to bloom into a garden but I was too afraid to leave my flower-pot for fear of being labeled a “Wild Flower”.
In the slide show FCR refers to "underutilized or vacant industrial/manufacturing buildings" such as the Ward Bakery Building at 800 Pacific Street (right; photo not from AY site). In 2004, FCR agreed to pay owner Leviev Boymelgreen $44 million for the closed bakery and another property; the Brooklyn Papers had reported that the previous owner had planned to build a hotel. The Municipal Art Society considers the building a potential historic resource. In other words, there was and remains a market for this building; it is underutilized by design.
Jerry Murphy spoke rather belligerently, and the professor smiled at the impetuous lad he had had for so many months in his classes.
Self-sacrificing
Images of the last time I saw my family before Grim reclaimed their souls again flash in my mind. How can I tell Kim I couldn’t choose his soul or my family’s? That I tried and found myself fighting for breath every single time?
· Create new Ebooks
I have been part of Swagbucks technically, for over a year. It was until about 2 months ago that I really started getting in to it and figuring it out. While it is not a "money maker" per se...it is a great way to earn free stuff as well as get some great deals. So...I am adding it to my list.
People in attendance also included Stampede volunteers, Calgary Police Services, Calgary Fire Department, Canadian Armed forces personnel, Stampede mascots and cowboys and cowgirls of all sizes and ages! I even ran into a few clowns.
There was not an adventurer in Europe with whom he was not familiar. No minister of state had such communications with secret agents and political spies as Sidonia...His extensive travels, his knowledge of languages, his daring and adventurous disposition, and his unlimited means, had given him opportunities of becoming acquainted with these characters...To these sources he owed that knowledge of strange and hidden things which often startled those who listened to him. Nor was it easy, scarcely possible, to deceive him. Information reached him from so many, and such contrary quarters...The secret history of the world was his pastime. His great pleasure was to contrast the hidden motive, with the public pretext, of transactions.
Tamil Nadu and West Bengal.
Alli has been doing amazing with the new baby. We've tried our best to find a good balance between her and the baby. She is really good at entertaining herself which is good, but we've also been trying to give her some extra attention when we can. She is doing great at adjusting and I'm SO proud of her! She is a good helper with talking to the baby to keep from sleeping so much during the day, getting me drinks of water and putting away the dirty diapers in the diaper pail.
Pass.
“Although this is a rare sighting of a saltwater crocodile this far south, people need to be sensible and stay away from the area.”
Finally got my new phone today. I’ve stepped up to the big leagues with a real touch screen! It has a slide keyboard too. Pretty much what I have wanted for awhile.
Spellbinders 2011 Heirloom Ornaments, Fancy Tags, light blue sheer ribbon, white lace from my stash, DecoArt Glimmer Dust, light blue rhinestones
My life has been really busy and my health is not so good but I'm going to try and get a blog post in here and there! At the moment, I won't be able to do as many tutorials, but I'll still show you what I've been making, ok?
In the summer of 2008, I was sick of reality. Not much I could do about the points of reality that were really getting to me, so I needed an escape. After quickly ruling out chemically induced states of alleviating my mental anguish, I took my healthy liver to the book store and got into some novels that carried my mind off to other places.
Today has been a lovely day, it started off sunny, then went very wet, but now it's lovely. So lovely in fact that Alan went to football training & I stayed out the hour & walked around Cuminestown, a neighbouring village. It was then back for lasagne for tea and to finish off this card before The Apprentice.
I work best with a schedule:
My favorite method of roasting is the high-heat sear at 500° F in the beginning, to create a nice crust over the bird that will lock in the moisture. Then reduce the heat to 350° and continue roasting until the thermometer reaches 160°. Tent the bird with foil and allow it to rest for 15 minutes before carving.
As a Tough Mudder I pledge that…
Gage and Cecilia were able to see one another and once again Cecilia tried to get Gage to play, but he wasn’t interested. Sadly, I didn’t take any pictures of them on Sunday. I did get one picture of Ci in her Ravens jersey on my phone, I will have to take a better one this weekend. She will be wearing this exact same outfit for Sunday’s game when the Ravens play the Patriots. I am superstitious when it comes to sports, especially the Ravens and Terps!
He said the same thing the next week and didn't seem to want to talk to me. That confused me because of all the things he had said to me. I finally asked him what was wrong.
Brandon 01:43 minutes Theodora 01:34 minutes
Do you hear the clank of the muskets?
Hired as independent contractors, Young Audiences teaching artists develop and implement programs for children and teachers throughout 18 counties in Northeast Ohio. We are seeking professional artists who can provide performances and workshops in all art forms but especially those working in Photography, Design, Digital Media Arts and Graphic Animation Arts.
‘que vos guida al som de l’escalina,
Despite the awful service, I have to say that the quality of the food alone is worth another visit to the Skybar in order to sample the other dishes. After all, this could have been a rare exception.
I loved The Little Mermaid when I was little. Still do in fact. This is my favorite song off that movie. This is such a fun one to play on the piano.
because in the end, you’ll pretend everything’s just fine
Wilson is tanking. House wants to move him to the hospital but Wilson refuses. He says he doesn’t want to die in a hospital. Wilson makes House promise he won’t take him to the ER. House promises. while Wilson weeps. Oh my gosh, Wilson. You are so crazy. Do not die on me.
Finally, send home the bottles and secretly have your students float it in the tub, put it in the
and she is out.
Just wow! Matt then ended it with a straw man in the last 30 seconds. Nice. You lost.
I didn’t mean to fall from heaven. Call it fate or destiny or whatever but it was all the fault of a malicious black cat.
Pididdle Manicure- Set 1 , 2 , 3
During the Middle Ages there was probably over 1000 stave churches in Norway (some believe it may have been as many as up to 2000 churches), but most of them disappeared in the period 1350-1650, probably due to the Black Death and the Reformation. In 1650 there were about 270 stave churches left, and in the next century 136 of these were lost. Today there are only 28 stave churches in Norway. Up untill 1992 Norway had 29 Stave Churches, but then an insignificant, pitiful person decided to burn down Fantoft Stave Church and 3-4 other churches, plus murder a guy, in order to promote his one-man band.
“It would be a tragedy, far beyond the church, if their fine work and their courageous voices were constrained.”
In one of those cruel twists of fate, Lindsay spends much of the song and video bemoaning “people lying/saying what they want from me” while running away from the paparazzi. If she only had it as good now that she’s a national punchline.
Actually we have several vacant blocks above us, which funnel water run-off from rain straight through our yard. We were having some major problems as a result, and so I begged and pleaded with the developer to come do something about it. Which they did yesterday, after several weeks and quite a few calls. All should have been well.
Here’s what our roadmap looks like:
For St. Francis de Sales, and for us, there is no separation of the call to holiness from the businessman, the housewife, the student, or the laborer. Virtue, prayer, and devotion are not solely the domain of the religious and ordained. We are called to elevate our work, our labors and our duties through true devotion to remove the painful realities of sin. He called the faithful to be acutely aware of their sins while courageously and consistently replacing them with grace and virtue. He encouraged slow, methodical purging of the effects of sin by first identifying them, then confessing them, and finally replacing them with holy devotion. First and foremost, we must examine our conscience:
Smith makes a yeoman effort to try to translate the bureaucratic language of the Draft Environmental Impact Statement (DEIS) to on-the-ground reality. Would subway service be fine? Not in Smith’s test of the Atlantic Avenue station.
grr
We had one great course on journalism and law, but in my recollection of journalism coursework, we spent a lot of time talking about the ethics of printing a photo of a U.S. marine weeping over the body of a dead comrade.
I start to count. One . . . Two . . . . Three. . . I have now seen exactly THREE teenagers with appropriate clothing for the weather. Three warm coats among the swirl and swarm of bodies.
Whatever I have left over I out in the cavity of the chook.
It’s not goodbye, just goodnight……
“Our usual method of posting trial outcomes on our website wasn’t generating much interest,” said clerk Eric Stern. “Alito’s muttering had over a million hits on YouTube alone, and we’re thinking that’s publicity you can’t put a price on.”
*This in not an actual picture of Steven.
Planning a school trip is a very involved process that requires finely-tuned organizational skills.
The word 'interactive' (defined by the Oxford Dictionary online as ‘two people or things influencing each other’) seems to have been annexed by the digital world these days, but I can't think of a more interactive activity than a child and companion sharing a brilliant book together. Reading a book is not only about the story and the images, though they are obviously at the very heart of the experience. It's also about touching, and turning, and pointing, and laughing, and turning back, and flicking forward, maybe lifting a few flaps ... it's about developing key coordination skills, not to mention a relationship with the book and your reading companion.
And in the meanwhile, thanks to Dan, I am going to be learning some large scale opt. algorithms. That sounds relieving. I just don’t want to become stupid with this long break. I also want to build a remote-controlled glider.
We hire cars and minibuses with the most reliable professional drivers chauffeur (Punctuality, confidentiality, courtesy, elegant chauffeur driver elegant, prestigious service, satisfaction guaranteed.)
I confirmed this. ”You guys are living together” Yes, ”When did she decide to keep her baby?”
Made of driftwood (as there are no trees within a hundred miles), this dwelling looks as though it could be toppled over by the slightest wind. Yet it has withstood the fiercest blizzards of nearly a century. What an incredible little structure!
Now to today's fun!
Eighty-two teachers, administrators and support staff in Washtenaw County have submitted retirement notices so far this year. Officials said overall, the number of notices are down, with the exception of Ann Arbor, Willow Run and Ypsilanti. Ann Arbor has stayed about the same, while 16 for Ypsilanti and 10 for Willow Run are slightly higher than normal for this time of year.
14th & 15th July The Great Shoreham Chilli Fest 2012 Coronation Green, High Street, Shoreham by Sea, BN43 5EE Dedicated chilli festival for everyone, whether you like chilli or not. Tasting and eating from mild to hot products and it’s FREE! www.chillifest.net
What can audiences expect from Yellow?
The Justices agreed that, on the facts before it, the Federal Circuit court was right to hold the Bilski patent invalid. They could not, however, agree, in wider terms, as to the correct judicial yardstick by which the validity of patents of this type was to be measured. Depending on your perspective, the words of the US patent code are (i) woefully imprecise and ill-equipped for determining the patent-eligibility of types of invention that the legislators could never have imagined, or (ii) magnificently flexible in their scope for interpretation in that very small number of disputed cases in which the boundaries of patent-eligibility must be identified.
Sonja:Furthermore, does not baptize in the Greek meant to immerse? This is what I’ve been taught, but admittedly don’t know Greek myself, but it seems the only way you could accurately picture the death burial and resurrection like they pointed out in one of the letters
The ad featured a picture of a young girl's head with a voiceover and text asking: "Would you allow your organs to save a life? You have 20 seconds to decide."
There's a reason most taverns come with a juke box. I'm not sure what it is, but clearly music and booze go together. The mix is so powerful that over the years some of my favorite tunes have just happened to involve alcohol.
In 2001 an obscure Finnish developer, Remedy, released one of the most defining action games of all time. Max Payne had been in development for four years, an unheard-of amount of time for the period, as Remedy attempted to get the game's tricky mix of film noir storyline, John Woo-inspired action and a new gameplay mechanic called 'bullet time' (in which time slows down to a point where individual bullets can be seen in motion) to gel together. Other events outpaced the game's gestation: development was effected by the release of The Matrix in 1999, which popularised bullet time on a huge scale and led to the introduction of several homages to the film in the game. The game's lengthy development was likened to that of Daikatana (the most colossal disappointment in the history of gaming), which did not bode well, especially as Max Payne's development was actually longer. Fortunately, upon release Max Payne was critically-acclaimed and commercially hugely successful.
But far more significant was the President's trip to the National Council of La Raza in Washington yesterday where the President spoke on the need for Hispanic empowerment and the need to pass comprehensive immigration reform. With his position among whites weakening and his standing in states like North Carolina and Virginia and Indiana very much up for grabs, the President is going to need to consolidate his hold in states with large Hispanic populations like Florida, Colorado, New Mexico and Nevada, that he won last time, and add other states with Hispanic populations like Arizona, Illinois and New Jersey, and to be able to get the 270 electoral votes that he needs to win the election.
“Malacañang is not privy to the discussions of the Liberal Party in the House.”
First, let me talk about where we agree. Both of us agree that most women today have lost the art of making a man like them without using sex appeal. We are in broad agreement that the right way for a woman to make a man like her is by being feminine. And we agree on what that means – showing the ability to be a wife and mother. If a woman talks to a man, rages against feminism, listens to his plan, and tries to help him with his plan, then he will like her (because he needs her and appreciates her). Also, it’s important that she have a plan of her own that he can help with, and she should let him help.
Move to the city someday and marry a black haired girl
On appeal, the Applicant referred to a definition of "hardware error" from an online dictionary: "error resulting from a malfunction of some physical component of the computer." The Applicant then argued that memory usage above a threshold is not caused by a malfunction of a physical component. The Applicant then explained that under the Examiner's interpretation, even an error that occurred when software allocated more memory than was currently available would be considered a "hardware error."
The bastard had completely ruined my living room. All the pictures were smashed, three of my records had had rounds put through em, poor lil Gore Vidal the cat had a sore foot and the walls had god knows how many holes right the way around – so much so I got the impression temporarily I were standing INSIDE a teabag.
Cardstock: Stampin Up Island Indigo, Whisper White, and Glossy White Cardstock:
I have been very lucky this week. I won a giveaway that Teri was having of some of her quilting magazines. Not only did she send me the magazines, she also sent me a couple of patterns, and a beautiful pincushion. I am thrilled to have received it all.
But — and I, obviously, would be thrilled to be able to hang out with her at the White House. So it would be good.
Relegation had rendered Blues European campaign as a meaningless distraction to many, and maybe it was. Maybe it cost us a crack at automatic promotion this season. But it was a fantastic distraction, and Blues gave it real go. Swatting aside a dreadful Nacional side may not have been an event of world-historical significance. But going to Brugge and winning, something that no English club, let alone a penniless second-tier outfit, has ever managed in a competitive fixture certainly was.
People confuse vamp with diva by placing them both in the catagory of high maintenance women. The dictionary defines vamp as, “a woman who uses sexual attraction to exploit men.” In comparison, Diva is defined as “a woman regarded as temperamental or haughty.”
Who: Council Member Letitia James, Principal Khalek Kirkland, Teachers, Staff, Students
Another of those infallible proofs of the physical resurrection is the fact that He ate with His followers. Refer back to Luke 24:43. His disciples gave him a piece of broiled fish and of a honeycomb, “And he took it, and did eat before them.” One must have a physical body to do these things.
birth mother prior to birth
At the end of the day, you have to be really cautious with regards to whom you are going to hire as a legal counsel considering that your future depends upon that person. The winning possibilities also rely on the expertise of the attorney and when you trust a lawyer who does not have enough knowledge therefore it goes without saying that you lost your chance of conquering the case. That is why it is better to hire the most effective Virginia criminal defense attorney.
Why do I do this? It’s not that I don’t want to write. It’s not that I don’t value my writing. It’s just that, every time I am about to sit down and write, there is a school assembly, an extra work meeting, a karate grading, or a cake sale I have to attend and naturally, of all the juggling balls that can be moved, it’s the writing. And, once I have got out of the habit of writing it becomes easy to think, oo, I’ll just pop a wash on. Or oo that downstairs cupboard really needs cleaning out. Or, oo, I wonder what’s happening on Twitter.
IT was REALLY fun and really cool! I was sad that I only had 2 colours, but it was fun to play! I immediately proceeded to Simon Says Stamp Superstore & ordered a BUNCH more Gelatos to play with!!!!! Can't wait till they get here!!!!
Why I like these: they’re like a blank canvas, just waiting for inspiration to strike!
6. The people sitting on the bench outside are feeding their two dogs each their own $3.25 ice cream cone.
How good are these wee prizes! Delish prizes for 2 fab lucky winners!
Meet the new blog ......Ideas At Midnight. I have been wanting to change the name for awhile now, but didn't think of anything that was honestly me. I chose the new name because it's honest and it's me....it seems to never fail, every night around midnight, my mind races, it races when it should be resting....however, being a full-time mom does not always allow some of my ideas and inspiration to come full circle, between homework, cooking, bathing, running everyone around town....midnight is my time, my time to reflect on my day, things I've seen that inspire me, planning new projects etc.
Katherine Jenkins chose 1996 when her father died of lung cancer. They waltzed to Josh Grobin's "The Way You Are" beautifully. Graceful, elegant, exquisite! She is classically gorgeous with a perfect woman's body. She broke down at the end of her dance but recovered enough to talk, which wasn't easy. Wow!!! Two TENS!! She got two nines last week. This is early to get such high scores. I hope people vote according to ability since she's not well-known here like she is in the UK. She should win at the rate she's going. (29)
And that, I think, just about covers the waterfront.
My mum has been staying with me for over two weeks and is due to go home again on Sunday - Mothers' Day in England. It's been quite hard to make her a card because she likes to sit with me in the Craft Croft. She plays solitaire games on my pc and I play on the other desk.
433 Hay St., Room 309 ___________
Sheds a light on my soul
I like card making and gifts because they can usually be completed in a day or so.
Good Phrasing:
"We saw nothing more. And never have we seen anything that could match it."
The Fredman, just got rid of some nasty poison ivy.
Again, the awesome sights, precious sounds and fresh smells which adorn the many crowns of nature as I ride my Suzuki 650 Burgman through the mountains are indescribable. Delicious! Tantalizing! Tempting!
After the first book ended, President Snow was very angry with Katniss. He viewed her use of berries to keep Peeta and herself alive as an attempt to subvert the Capital’s power. Hostilities were brewing in the districts and they could be tied back to Katniss’ actions. After a brief victory tour to each district and witnessing an uprising firsthand, Katniss finds out that she and Peeta will be going back into the arena for the 75th Hunger Games. We witness the events surrounding the games much like the first book, followed by Katniss and Peeta building an alliance with several other past victors. This works out and in the end Katniss destroys the forcefield surrounding the arena and is captured by the rebels.
LOL...not really...well, maybe some of them were:-)
Good news for those of you wanting to see my WWG Mayhem City Police Station - the end is in sight. All being well I hope to finish it this month. Yeehaa! I've been making a lot of office furniture for it and I have just five rooms to decorate - four detectives' offices and the large squad room. I only have a bunch of book shelves to make and then I'll be able to complete all four detectives' offices. The squad room will be the last to get made but fortunately, I already have a lot of the furniture for it already constructed. This has been a mammoth project, by far the largest card building I've ever made. I can't wait to finish it and then move on to something else. Don't ask what just yet. I have loads of options available.
GFSHP Blog (gfshpblog.wordpress.com) is a participant in the Amazon Services LLC and Amazon EU Associates Programmes designed to provide a means for sites to earn advertising fees by advertising and linking to amazon.com, amazon.ca, amazon.co.uk, amazon.de, amazon.fr, amazon.it and amazon.es. Certain content that appears on this website comes from Amazon Services LLC and/or Amazon EU. This content is provided “as is” and is subject to change or removal at any time.
- break one of the eggs into the butter mix and beat in, next add a little of the flour mix and beat again, then add the second egg and beat it in followed by a little more flour and beat in.
Love using a tag for one and cutting Marci out was something I would not have done on my own. She is popped up on some MME dp and the little "sprigs" of flower image is "lavender sprig"also from the Stampotique store.
This was one of the findings from a recent collaboration between the University of Edinburgh's Institute for Music in Human and Social Development and the Nash Ensemble, a London-based chamber group. In a programme planned as a residency during which musicians and scientists could exchange and deepen ideas, delegates were treated to a series of concerts and lectures under the rubric "Great music and why we love it".
~Polly
They are scared that they will still pay too much for the vehicle, not get enough for their trade, pay too high a payment, pay too high of an interest rate and most of all…….they are scared that they bought the wrong vehicle!
282 4. “First Impressions.” Political Science Reviewer, vol. 26, pp. 1, 248-57 (1997). This is the initial response to a collection of seven articles, “The Scholarship of George Anastaplo,” in volume 26 of the Political Science Reviewer. See Item C-1998(10), below.
I’m poking at a delicate topic here for some, but I came across a young woman (18) who asked me if our business (my husband and I have a small medical practice) was hiring. She had a small amount of job experience and assured me that she could “answer phones.” If we were hiring, we aren’t because we are a small practice, we’d need someone with medical billing and coding experience. Experience is always preferential. Calling up an insurance company isn’t like ordering a pizza, and sometimes it takes two or three submits to finally get paid for the work you did six months ago.
I took some days off work to recharge my mental batteries, something I have not done in a very long time. The last time I spent more then a day in a row off work was maybe three years ago. Worth mentioning that my last true vacation, where I was participating in my passion – scuba diving, was in 2004, pretty much to the month 8 years ago !
Off to his office. His dad asks about Anna’s resignation and his mother is there too. He asks where Anna is now and laments losing a good partner for golf. Yeah, that was her value I guess! Rich spoiled people! His mother tells him it’s of no value where she’s gone-as in good riddance and wonders if they should thank Lee Ga Young for it. His father shifts his attention to the new upcoming brand GG. Wasn’t it an acquaintance of Jae Hyuk doing it? Jae Hyuk simply agrees and his father compliments Young Gul’s business sense and asks Jae Hyuk to call him out for lunch/dinner one day. Jae Hyuk tries to object-he’s not that good a friend but his father tells him in business there is no I do it because I want to, Young Gul is good for business so bring him.
I got the white one, and she should be here in 1-2 weeks.
You move on,
punch in punch out
. . . For surplus and absence alike,
In this picture Zipfizz was at Valley of Fire State Park, Nevada!
In a social milieu that encourages the expression of a variety of opinions on every question that arises, it is important to recognize dissent for what it is, and not to mistake it for a mature contribution to a balanced and wide-ranging debate. It is the truth revealed through Scripture and Tradition and articulated by the Church’s Magisterium that sets us free.As to champagne, Fr Z is sticking with the one that featured for the announcement of Summorum Pontificum. I'm minded to branch out and get some Bolly.
6) Somewhere, the operation Fast and Furious II is getting underway.
I put both chokos in my fruit basket and let them sit on the bench to sprout at room temperature in their own time. You can see them above almost covered by tomatoes.
I knew that he was in pain, but he never seemed to pity himself and he never failed to show concern for how I was doing. He told me to stay strong and to ‘enjoy today, because today is what you have and you don’t want to waste it.’
This past semester at school went really well too. I took my first Photography class; it was all black & white film, and I loved it. As much as I enjoy digital, it’s a blast developing and printing photos. I also took Computer Imaging, which was loads of fun… even though a good chunk of it was review. I finished up the Design & Foundation Drawing class chain taking the second part of each. The last class I took the past semester was Ceramics I, I decided to take this so that I could make things that I can actually use in every-day-life now that the classes are done.
My husband is busy finishing renovations to meet home safety standards to have the baby come and live with us.
The bartender smiled and shrugged.
Of course there's all the hoopla about working mothers. All human beings who have a brain and a mother already know that all mothers work. Some just have two or three jobs, and one pays currency that can be banked and exchanged; the other pays currency that fuels the 3 am feedings or the grim visit to a principal's office or . . . well, the very minute you may be reading this.
I love this time of the year and it is now that my heart experiences a bittersweet longing for the views I once had at my disposal at the white house on the hill. Every day, with the onset in May, offered spectacular sunset skies and an endless twilight horizon. Today all I see are treetops and red roofs.
Then, as I’m sure some of you have guessed, I go jogging. I concentrate on my breath while running, I take in the magnificent scenery around me, and I meditate on these beautiful women and the ways in which I do want to be like them, on how fortunate I am to have known them and to be where I am now, with William and the amazing life we have together.
It’s World Dance Day!
The sky looked a little dark as we packed everything into the car and got everybody together. Megan’s neighbor friend Abby went to ask her mom if she could come to our house, and in that short time a strong wind began to blow. She reached our car right as the first big drops hit the car.
Although I definitely consider Sunday's race a huge success, I have to be honest and admit that I didn't have that instant feeling that the race was great and I felt good running it. At the finish I felt a bit unsure. I felt a bit unsettled. I felt like the race totally kicked my butt. It wasn't until after the dust had settled and I realized I had a slight new PR and all the other good things accomplished that I started to feel really good about the whole thing.
When was the last time a book REALLY resonated with you? The book that, rather than end up in last summer’s yard sale, is actually rubber-banded together because you’ve literally read it to pieces but can’t find a replacement copy? The one you can recite entire passages from? The one you recommend to everyone and their cousin?
Not in the then.
seasoning to taste
I've often said in my workshops that homeschooling moms have to be careful to avoid setting themselves up for the worst empty nest syndrome in the world. I followed all my own advice over the years, preparing myself, getting credentials so I could have meaningful work and ministry to do, but I never realized exactly how hard all of this was going to be.
Dove Canada http://twitter.com/#!/DoveCanada) sent this box of goodies for the women of George Herman House to me this past week. My house smelt soooo beautiful, fresh and clean. I think I'm going to just keep Dove bars of soap hidden throughout the house for its lovely scent. I spent this weekend putting one of each of the items in gift bags for the 10 residents of the house.
Finally after four months of doctoring we did another colonoscopy. You can imagine how both of us felt when Dr. Hightower told me that there was a suspicious mass at the sight of my previous surgery and I would need surgery again. The son-of-bitch at VA missed it. It would not have made any difference in my needing surgery, but I would not have gone through such hell and have the problem taken care of a year earlier. The bastard.
We took our very first road trip to see Great Grandma Nall in Arizona for her 100th birthday. Here Jilliana is wearing her headphones and watching the tv. I cannot say it was the best road trip. We had to hit the side of the road once for a "Chinese Style" bathroom stop as well as a couple of other stops.
Jesus said:
chance, make it happen!
How to Clean Hard Water or Hard Water Spots From Your Exterior Windows
Regarding my recent disappearance from the airwaves, Blogger has sent me this note:
1. Big In Japan - Society For Cutting Up Men
"Ughhh, I am out of deodorant."
“Surely you have been in a situation in your life where some sort of spell would have made it easier?”
I guess I can stop using exclamation points now, but you can surely understand my excitement. Michael and I haven't been away together for over a year. In fact, we've never been anywhere without all of the chil'rens for as long as seven days.
I don’t think I fully understood at the time the importance of the trip. It really was one of the best experiences of my life. It causes me to grasp at any memory I can find, to place myself in the context of any photo that was documented (And there are lots!), just so I can relive an ounce of it again.
What I found was America’s most fan-friendly sport, and a sport that – at least live — combined some of the best aspects of football and baseball and still had fast cars, even if they were still Pontiacs.
pink petal show
Through our Lord Jesus Christ, you Son,
our 1st project was to make a seamed hat--more of a winter cap. i used merino wool in some lovely colors for my 1st hat. it's made using a garter stitch and is super easy to do.
Thursday morning I went with the 2nd graders on a field trip to see the San Francisco Symphony. As I walked with one student, they recalled performances they saw in past years. He was excited to hear the Star Wars theme again. Once inside we were ushered to seats above and behind the stage. They looked down at the orchestra and out onto the entire theater. We would be on display for the entire audience which made the teacher, Ms. C weary. She drew this to her students’ attention, letting them know they needed to be on especially good behavior. This was part of the field trip’s purpose: to teach the kids how to be a respectful audience at live shows.
And just a heads up that I am working on the next quarterly challenge. I will reveal all about it next week with sign ups in case you would like to join me on the journey!
Have a nice weekend!!!!!
The two investigations are woven in together, both narrated in the third person with a focus on different characters at different times. Both mysteries are satisfyingly twisty and tangled and there was more than enough to keep me turning pages. Since the two mysteries are over fifty years apart, there are plenty of differences in setting and circumstance to prevent us getting confused, and switches only happen at chapter breaks.
i can request, because i have certain extra thing that you don't have, you want your credit, you need to follow my request, if you think you can skip my request, then i can skip your credit also. think of it, do more is better than less, but the problem is people always wanted short-cut to succeed.
Marquess of Salisbury. Urgent.
Px
"Certainly, monsieur." The barman seemed pleased with the idea.
Can you have a problem in your body and not know it?
So far anyone who still has a hard time believing that Minute Maid has got no preservatives added - meaning it's THAT natural, it's almost like it's plucked straight from the tree, it's just as Mother Nature wanted your orange juice to be, it's got nothing but the good stuff yes, none of those potentially toxic stuff that can harm your brain, kidneys, heart; cause tumors aargh- the list of preservatives' bad effects just go on!!! Anyway, just to prove a point on just how good Minute Maid Pulpy is 'cause it's got NO PRESERVATIVES ADDED, I'm gonna drink it for the rest of my life! It's also a great drink this cold season because it has lots of Vitamin C.
For those of you who want to buy non-GMO food now, here is a link to what is currently Non-GMO-Food in your stores:
The Xerox WorkCentre XE80 Printer is the Right Fit in Your Small Office
May every dip of your paddle lead you towards a rediscovery of yourself, of your canoeing companions, of the wonders of nature, and of the unmatched physical and spiritual rapture made possible by the humble canoe - Pierre Elliott Trudeau, foreword to Path of the Paddle by Bill Mason, 1980
My other brother Keith was on as we took the show on the road to Chicago and his improv group Legitimate Beef was on. They were hilarious, they were back in episode 6.
be provided to participants). Registration is not required.
In November 2005, after the show began broadcasting on XFM in October 2001, Guardian Unlimited started to offer The Ricky Gervias Show as a podcast series of 12 shows. It was so popular it broke Guinness World Records after gaining an average of 261,670 downloads per episode during its first month. By September 2006, the series had been downloaded nearly 18 million times, according to the BBC. As of March 2011, this number has increased to over 300 million downloads.
Most importantly, be patient when starting your new business. Don’t do it just for the money because then you will lose your enthusiasm fast. Do for the passion of it and you’ll never get tired.
1 gas
iMovie for iPhone review
Can't wait for Jesse Jackson and Al Sharpton to express their outrage about this one. Apparently the Baltimore PD isn't very good at keeping tourists secure these days. But at least a few folks got a good laugh.
Great Salt Lake
It has now been over two years since I read this book and I still can’t stop thinking about it. This is the book that got me back to reading. I am still waiting for a sequel. Everyone in the world should read this book. It should be a life requirement.
“What is the difficulty?”
And two steps are where you part the true dancers from arthritic and rusty tin men.
Some of my friends and I are organising an open house this weekend (26-27 Nov), called Sinterklaas Ateliers in Moordrecht, to present and offer our handmade products for sale. It takes place in Helene’s beautiful home in Moordrecht, near Gouda. You will love the architecture of this home. The very first picture on this post is one of the corners of the house, which will be transformed into lovely handmade exposition!!
5) Love you can make your clipboards private or public
That was roughly the length of my first manuscript, and it was the first in a projected four-book series. Even for fantasy, it was… ambitious.
Finally, Albert rose and wiped the tears from his cheeks. He glanced down the long table at the faces he loved, and then, holding his hands close to his right cheek, he said softly, “No, brother. I cannot go to Nuremberg. It is too late for me. Look … look what four years in the mines have done to my hands! The bones in every finger have been smashed at least once, and lately I have been suffering from arthritis so badly in my right hand that I cannot even hold a glass to return your toast, much less make delicate lines on parchment or canvas with a pen or a brush. No, brother … for me it is too late.”
Okay, so you have your usual study play list that you listen to religiously when preparing for finals, but how about a change of pace? New music can give you a new energy and approach to studying that might just be the extra kick that you need. Not sure what to put on it? No worries. Check out StereoMood (http://www.stereomood.com) for some amazing play lists for each and every mood that you can imagine. It free and unlimited with no commercials, and most of the music on the site is not widely known so it gives you a great chance to discover something new!
In its place is a vision of dystopian angst where a man sits in traffic being bombarded by moronic tweets. He could have made something of his life if it wasn’t for all the constant interruptions. To his left and right he sees that his fellow motorists are in similar catatonic states. His brain twitches and splutters with occasional life ‘…What was that great idea I had yesterday before someone sent me a link to a monkey throwing faeces at a nun? I’ll never get those eight seconds back…What other important stuff did it shunt it out of my head?…Can’t get my relatively high-powered car above 15 miles an hour…must invent time machine…warn past self…can’t…form…rationale…help me…’
He has, for the same reason, avoided using any of DID's official patrons, seemingly in order to create the impression that this is a group of 'independent' people not linked with DID (when in fact most of them are), or who at very least, in the main, share Falconer's own views.
Lowe’s can go shove it, along with all the other companies that caved in gutlessly to these religious lunatics. I won’t set foot in their stores again, not after this. The Arab/Muslim community has been around for decades in Dearborn, Michigan, and now all of a sudden a pack of yahoos insist they’re bloodthirsty killers, claiming that they’re lying about Islam. Lowe’s gave the pathetic excuse that they only dropped their ads because they thought it was a ‘bad show’. Not good enough, sweetheart. There are more holes in that defense than a piece of Swiss cheese. Try giving an honest answer for once. People may actually thank you for it.
- Goethe
From the Pacific northwest (oregon/washington state).. through the midwest … Kansas, Oklahoma, Missouri, Iowa, Nebraska, Arkansas …. through the southeast … Mississippi, Alabama, Georgia, and Florida….. we are seeing severe weather, strong thunderstorms, damaging winds, hail, and confirmed tornadoes on the ground (in the midwest for sure).
Such a bad science and misrepresentation of Slavic religion leads us to the third problem – the frustration because the lack of proper study of Slavic religion, meager number of papers on it and reluctance of majority of scholars to research pre-Christian period of Slavic people is open invitation to hordes of cranks ready to fill in the void. Starting with “fakelore”, going through wild hypothesis of Atlantis and Lemuria, down to UFO’s and aliens building pyramidal shaped mountains these cranks are firmly claiming the other side of bad science spectrum, being no better than their counterparts – proponents of “official” science.
Proverbs 24:16
"In fact, just three weeks into Jacob Zuma's presidency, there are disturbing signs that one of the most destructive trends of (former president) Thabo Mbeki's reign – towards the centralisation of power – is being revived and intensified," Zille said.
Only a week left of classes and then finals. I have a few projects due and one test. it’s honestly not that bad anymore. the most stressful thing is still trying to set up and internship. The first interview I had decided to go with someone else. Then finally the internship I really really really want contacted me for an interview. The interview went well and I have been waiting to hear back from them. They are going to pick 3 or 4 interns and they are really busy planning their big spring event so the last few interviews got pushed back and they haven’t made up their mind yet. I will hopefully hear from them by the middle of next week. or i might go crazy. then the other three places I applied to didn’t respond to my emails. I even sent out follow ups and tried to contact them multiple times. don’t know what’s up with that.
Reagan, Bush and Bush didn’t!
Last night was something magical.
news of a birth, both
Mary D'Antonio, 55, New York, N.Y.
For seven and seventy years at sea
The propeller blade spun off and struck the fuselage, “sending aluminium shards into the cabin, then fell to the ground.”
Well, I had had enough of this crazy train rain, so I brought a little spring cheer into my own step.
her bank account!) And since she recently
The way to meet bad things is complicated. Being inconvenienced at the airport in the name of national security isn’t the same as pursuing cancer treatment or rebuilding your credit record. Yet there are similarities. Bad things need to be countered by returning, if possible, to a calm sense of normality where the pursuit of happiness is possible once more. Words like acceptance, balance, healing, community, compassion, justice, and security come to mind, but they are generic. Each bad thing is personal, no matter how vast the scale.
Keep in mind, the AT&T / T-Mobile merger attempt was just as much about these spectrum holdings (2GHz) as the rest of its holdings…. (http://www.fiercewireless.com/story/visualized-aws-and-700-mhz-spectrum-att-could-gain-t-mobile/2011-06-28)
Variety is like the hummingbird in the room, its the small unique pieces that add interest. Bring it in small doses to avoid to much chaos going on in a room.
In 2 Peter, the Apostle Peter writes in the shadow of death to encourage the enduring Christians throughout Asia, Galatia, Pontus, Bithynia, and Cappadocia to continue in faith and virtue over lusts. Peter encouraged these to be a pure mind by being “mindful of the words which were spoken before by the holy prophets, and of the commandment of us, the apostles of the Lord and Savior, knowing this first: that scoffers will come in the last days, walking according to their own lusts” (2 Pet. 3:2-3). In 2 Peter 3:15-16, this Apostle confirmed that “all” of Paul’s writings were considered a part of “other Scriptures”. Obviously, all of Paul’s writings were being collected by congregations and considered scripture. This mention alone confirms the Apostles’ oversight of the New Testament. Now, Peter said that Paul wrote “unto you”. This is Peter’s 2nd letter unto those presented in 1 Peter 1:1 (2 Pet. 3:1), which was written to “Pontus, Galatia, Cappadocia, Asia, and Bithynia”. Peter said that Paul wrote “unto you”, and as mentioned before, Paul’s letters were written directly to the Ephesians and Colossians in Asia and to the Galatians, and not specifically to all of Asia and to anyone in Pontus, Cappadocia, and Bithynia. Evidently, Paul’s letters were for everyone though first written to specific congregations. These “other Scriptures” show that Paul’s epistles were being added to the Old Testament as well as to other New Testament writings. The practice of collecting inspired writings and adding to the collection of the Old Testament had very easily been transferred over to the collecting of the New Testament scriptures. See How the Old Testament was Collected.
In my opinion, you are all winners.
Saturday was also my nephew's lacrosse game. It was a tough one to watch. My nephew is in his first year of organized lacrosse (and he's got 10 other teammates that can say the same). His team was clearly outmatched. He was a little frustrated to say the least. No goals scored for his team the entire game. But I told him that their play improved drastically from the first 10 minutes to the last 10 minutes. Gradual improvement. And of course - effort. You don't need to be a superstar to have that.
This is important step so do not skip!
I read on a blog that baking super thin cake layers reduces the dome that often occurs, but that definitely wasn't true for this recipe. Instead of having two domed cakes to trim I had four. Not a huge deal since I snacked on the scraps until dessert, but it took extra time since I only two pans of each size. I also used some leftover salted caramel for the caramel drizzle, which my husband said was a bit much. I actually liked it but I'm a total salt addict so you may want to adapt according to your taste. I also used salted pecan pieces so that might have something to do with it.
The subject appears to be a model of an early railway locomotive, its wheels resting on wooden rails. My knowledge of early steam is so meagre that I couldn't begin to make an identification, but from a cursory glance through a selection of Googled images I'm guessing it was a design from the mid-1800s. An inscription handwritten in pen at the base of the mount, below the print, suggests that the photograph was taken in Brighton on 10 October 1905 (10/10/05).
"If we can't get fish, we eat rats. Others are following the railway lines and the roads used by the grain trucks. They pick up any seeds or grains that fall off and eat them. There is nothing else we can do."
I’ll start with the peaceful images.
Click here for more ticket information. There are also a limited number of VIP packages available, including meet and greet. VIP Meet and Greet Packages start at $175.
Mission: iPossible
All things end.
My youngest son taking off down the hill.
author of How Strong Women Pray
It just reiterates the fact that people are more influenced by those around them then an advert directed to them. Hence marketers need to find new and creative ways to reach individual groups of people to gain maximum exposure for their brand. Marketers also need to find those individuals that are the leaders in the group, those that start the trend. Grass root research has been appropriate in aiding marketers in identifying these individuals, the trick therein lies in convincing these individuals that brand is good so that they may spread a WOM epidemic and influence the rest of their groups.
As can happen when one is boozing, there was a bit of banter including a mention of the respective attractiveness of female work colleagues. Nothing as crude as Andy Gray or Richard Keys for whilst we may be both unreconstructed sexist male chauvinists we are at least gentlemen and would not behave like that. Among the bantering came a bet. It wasn’t a bet regarding any female colleague but it was a bet in regard to the likely outcome of a work based event. My erstwhile colleague applied logic to the facts of the situation and made a reasonable and logical prediction. I declined to apply logic and instead applied human nature to the situation and predicted a different more chaotic outcome. He suggested a small bet to make it interesting. “Okay, but just for fun, I’m not betting my house or anything” came my reply. “Ten pints?” “Okay.” “Not Stella, Ten pints of your local beer versus ten pints of my local beer”. “How will I claim ten pints when I win, do I have to travel to Lincoln?” “Ten pint bottles, on my desk when I win”. A shake of the hand and one week later I was paid up in full with ten lovely bottles of a beer of Lincoln, from what appears to be a microbrewery. Poachers, the website here. A locally sourced taste of Lincolnshire. I’ve eaten Lincolnshire sausages and they were alright, so I fully expect the beer to be decent enough too. Expect full reviews of Lincoln micro brewed pong when I get round to it. I look forward to it. Lovely beer to throw down my neck that I didn’t pay for. That is as they say, living. If any blogger is aware of this grog, let me know what you think and what I can expect. Don’t bother telling me what food each bottle might go with, but I am always interested if you’ve necked it and have an opinion on the grog. Free grog, always happy to receive it, always happy when I do.
